Illinois, session 104th, HB3399.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Geothermal Homes and Businesses Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that: 7        (1) Geothermal heating and cooling systems leverage 8    the year-round stability of the earth's underground 9    temperature, which creates renewable energy potential, in 10    order to provide a zero-cost base temperature for space 11    heating or cooling and water heating. 12        (2) The Geothermal Homes and Businesses Program would 13    promote innovation in, and production and use of, 14    geothermal heating and cooling systems that (i) 15    significantly reduce ratepayer impacts and spur economic 16    development in the State, (ii) expand job opportunities 17    for State trade-based labor and manufacturing in the 18    United States, (iii) bolster resiliency and support State 19    infrastructure, and (iv) mitigate local pollution and 20    global greenhouse gas emissions. 21        (3) Incentives generated through the use of 22    State-sited geothermal heating and cooling systems under 23    this Act will promote innovation and investment in   HB3399 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    geothermal heating and cooling systems. 2    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:3    "Agency" means the Illinois Power Agency.4    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.5    "Geothermal heating and cooling system" means a system 6located in this State that meets all of the following 7requirements: 8        (1) exchanges thermal energy from groundwater or a 9    shallow ground source to generate thermal energy through 10    an electric geothermal heat pump or a system of electric 11    geothermal heat pumps interconnected with any geothermal 12    extraction facility that is (i) a closed loop or a series 13    of closed loop systems in which fluid is permanently 14    confined within a pipe or tubing and does not come in 15    contact with the outside environment or (ii) an open loop 16    system in which ground or surface water is circulated in 17    an environmentally safe manner directly into the facility 18    and returned to the same aquifer or surface water source; 19        (2) meets or exceeds the current federal Energy Star 20    product specification standards; 21        (3) replaces or displaces less efficient space or 22    water heating systems, regardless of fuel type; 23        (4) replaces or displaces less efficient space cooling 24    systems, when applicable; 25        (5) does not feed electricity back to the grid, as   HB3399 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    defined at the level of the geothermal heat pump; and 2        (6) became operational on or after June 1, 2017.3    "Program" means the Geothermal Homes and Businesses 4Program. 5    Section 15. Program establishment. Beginning January 1, 62026, the long-term renewable resources procurement plan 7developed by the Agency shall include a Geothermal Homes and 8Businesses Program for the procurement of geothermal renewable 9energy credits. The Program shall be designed to provide for 10the steady, predictable, and sustainable growth of new 11geothermal heating and cooling system deployment in the State. 12The Program shall function as a separate and distinct 13procurement program that does not draw from other sources that 14allocate and fund renewable energy credits. 15    Section 20. Categorization. Qualifying systems for the 16Program shall be organized into 3 categories based on 17structural features and use-cases: (i) Residential, (ii) 18Commercial, and (iii) Public or Environmental Justice. These 19categories shall be defined at the discretion of the Agency.  20    Section 25. Geothermal heating and cooling system 21calculation methodology. Energy derived from a geothermal 22heating and cooling system shall be eligible for inclusion in 23meeting the requirements of the Program. Eligible geothermal   HB3399 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1renewable energy credits shall be created by calculating the 2difference between the energy load used by the geothermal 3heating and cooling system and the energy load used by a less 4efficient baseline system for the equivalent space heating and 5cooling or water heating load required by the building. 6Geothermal renewable energy credits shall be expressed in 7megawatt-hour units. To make this calculation, the Agency 8shall identify an appropriate formula supported by a 9geothermal industry trade organization. This formula shall 10generally reflect calculation methodologies already in use for 11other State renewable portfolio standards. The Agency shall 12determine the form and manner in which such geothermal 13renewable energy credits are verified, in accordance with 14national best practices. 15    Section 30. Program block allocation. 16    (a) As used in this Section, "period" means each Program 17delivery year through a specified delivery year.18    (b) The Program shall include the following for eligible 19projects for each delivery year: 20        (1) a block of geothermal renewable energy credit 21    volumes;22        (2) a price for geothermal renewable energy credits 23    within the identified block; and 24        (3) the terms and conditions for securing a spot on a 25    waitlist once the block is fully committed or reserved.  HB3399 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    The Agency shall strive to issue blocks sized to provide 2for stability and market growth. 3    (c) The Agency shall propose a block for each Program 4delivery year through the delivery year beginning in 2035. 5Before the close of the period in 2035, the Agency shall 6propose blocks for each Program delivery year for the next 7period, beginning in 2036 and ending at the discretion of the 8Agency. The Agency shall continue to establish subsequent 9periods. 10    (d) The waitlist of projects in a given year shall carry 11over to apply to the subsequent year when another block is 12opened. For each category for a delivery year, the Agency 13shall determine the amount of geothermal renewable energy 14credit volumes available in each block and the purchase price 15for each block, if the purchase price provided and the total 16geothermal renewable energy credit volume in all blocks for 17all categories shall be sufficient to meet Program goals. 18    (e) Systems in any of the categories listed in Section 20 19may reserve volumes in the annual block. However, at least 33% 20of each annual block shall be reserved by systems that meet the 21Agency's definition of "residential". At the Agency's 22discretion, certain volumes of an annual block may be reserved 23for the Public or Environmental Justice category at a price 24that makes it feasible and affordable for buildings such as 25public schools, military bases, military hospitals, and 26low-income housing to install geothermal heating and cooling   HB3399 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1systems on premises. Additional allocation of geothermal 2renewable energy credit volumes per block per structural 3category may be defined at the discretion of the Agency. 4    (f) The Agency shall establish Program eligibility 5requirements that ensure that systems that enter the Program 6are sufficiently mature to indicate a demonstrable path to 7completion. The Agency may periodically review its prior 8decisions establishing the amount of geothermal renewable 9energy credit volumes in each annual block and the purchase 10price for each block and may propose, on an expedited basis, 11changes to the previously set values, including, but not 12limited to, redistributing the amounts and the available funds 13as necessary and appropriate, subject to Commission approval. 14The Agency may define different block sizes, purchase prices, 15or other distinct terms and conditions for projects located in 16different utility service territories if the Agency deems it 17necessary. 18    (g) The Program shall be designed to ensure that 19geothermal renewable energy credits are procured from projects 20in diverse locations and are not concentrated in a few 21regional areas. 22    Section 35. Program block pricing. The Program shall 23provide a transparent annual schedule of geothermal renewable 24energy credit prices and quantities to enable the geothermal 25heating and cooling market to scale up and for geothermal   HB3399 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1renewable energy credit prices to adjust at a predictable rate 2over time. Geothermal renewable energy credit prices set by 3the Agency for the Program shall be reflected as a set value or 4the product of a formula. 5    Section 40. Approved vendors requirement. 6    (a) Property owners participating in the Program shall be 7required to work with an approved vendor for Program 8registration and application, geothermal renewable energy 9credit generation, geothermal renewable energy credit 10verification, geothermal renewable energy credit delivery, as 11well as Program contract fulfillment and payment. 12    (b) The Agency shall establish a registration process for 13entities seeking to qualify for Program-administered incentive 14funding and establish baseline qualifications for vendor 15approval. The Agency shall maintain a list of approved 16entities on the Program's website, and may revoke a vendor's 17ability to receive Program-administered incentive funding 18status upon a determination that the vendor failed to comply 19with contract terms, the law, or other Program requirements. 20    (c) The Agency shall establish Program requirements and 21minimum contract terms to ensure projects are properly 22installed and operate to the level of expected benefits. 23Program requirements may include on-site inspections and photo 24documentation of projects under construction. The Agency may 25require repairs, alterations, or additions to remedy any   HB3399 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1enforcement actions taken in response to those complaints. 2    Section 45. Contract terms; advanced capital; contract 3length; transfer of geothermal heating and cooling system 4ownership. 5    (a) The Agency shall propose a payment structure for 6Program contracts upon a demonstration of qualification or 7need and applicant firms shall have advanced capital disbursed 8before geothermal renewable energy credits are first 9generated. The amount or percentage of capital advanced for 10residential systems shall be at the discretion of the Agency 11but not be less than 40% of the total contract. The amount or 12percentage of capital advanced for commercial, public, or 13environmental justice systems shall be at the discretion of 14the Agency.15    (b) The amount or percentage of advanced capital may vary 16by year, or inter-year, by structure category, block, and 17other factors as deemed applicable by the Agency and by an 18applicant's demonstration of need. 19    (c) Contracts featuring capital advanced prior to system 20operation shall feature provisions to ensure both the 21successful development of applicant projects and the delivery 22of geothermal renewable energy credits for the full term of 23the contract, including ongoing collateral requirements and 24other provisions deemed necessary by the Agency. The 25percentage or amount of capital advanced prior to system   HB3399 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1operation shall not increase the overall contract value, 2except that contracts executed under this Section may feature 3geothermal renewable energy credits higher than those offered 4to similar projects participating in other categories. 5    (d) The capital which is not advanced shall be disbursed 6upon delivery of geothermal renewable energy credits as per 7contract fulfillment over the delivery term, not to exceed, 8during each delivery year, the contract price multiplied by 9the estimated annual geothermal renewable energy credit 10generation amount. 11    (e) For geothermal renewable energy credits that qualify 12and are procured under the Program, geothermal renewable 13energy credits delivery contract length shall be 15 years. 14    (f) If generation of geothermal renewable energy credits 15during a delivery year exceeds the estimated annual generation 16amount, the excess geothermal renewable energy credits shall 17be carried forward to future delivery years and shall not 18expire during the delivery term. If geothermal renewable 19energy credit generation during a delivery year, including 20carried forward excess geothermal renewable energy credits, if 21any, is less than the estimated annual generation amount, 22payments during such delivery year shall not exceed the 23quantity generated plus the quantity carried forward 24multiplied by the contract price. The electric utility shall 25receive all geothermal renewable energy credits generated by 26the project during the first 25 years of operation and retire   HB3399 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1all geothermal renewable energy credits paid for under this 2item and return at the end of the delivery term all geothermal 3renewable energy credits that were not paid for. 4    (g) Geothermal renewable energy credits generated by the 5project thereafter shall not be transferred under the 6geothermal renewable energy credit delivery contract with the 7counterparty electric utility. Subscription of 90% of total 8geothermal renewable energy credit volumes or greater shall be 9deemed to be fully subscribed.10    (h) Each project shall be subject to the Prevailing Wage 11Act. The Agency shall require verification that, for all 12construction for a project that was performed by a renewable 13energy credit delivery contract holder, its contractors, or 14its subcontractors, the construction employees received an 15amount for the work equal to or greater than the general 16prevailing rate as provided for in Section 3 of the Prevailing 17Wage Act.18    (i) Geothermal renewable energy credits for any single 19geothermal heating and cooling project that is 285 tons or 20larger and is procured after the effective date of this Act 21shall only be generated by a project built by general 22contractors who entered into a project labor agreement, as 23defined by the Illinois Power Agency Act, prior to 24construction. The project labor agreement shall be filed with 25the Director in accordance with procedures established by the 26Agency through its long-term renewable resources procurement   HB3399 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1plan. Any information submitted to the Agency pursuant to this 2subsection shall be considered commercially sensitive 3information. The project labor agreement shall provide the 4names, addresses, and occupations of the owner of the plant 5and the individuals representing the labor organization 6employees that participate in the project labor agreement. The 7project labor agreement shall also specify terms and 8conditions as provided in this Act. 9    Section 50. Contract terms; collateral and counterparties. 10    (a) Each contract shall include provisions to ensure the 11delivery of the estimated quantity of geothermal renewable 12energy credits, including the requirement of a bid security 13deposit in an amount deemed appropriate by the Agency. 14    (b) An obligated utility shall be the counterparty to the 15contracts executed under this Act that are approved by the 16Commission. No contract shall be executed for an amount that 17is less than one geothermal renewable energy credit per year. 18    (c) Nothing in this Act shall require the utility to 19advance any payment or pay any amounts that exceed the actual 20amount of revenues anticipated to be collected by the utility 21inclusive of eligible funds collected in prior years and 22alternative compliance payments for use by the utility. 23    (d) Contracts may be assignable, but only to entities 24first deemed by the Agency to have met Program terms and 25requirements applicable to direct Program participation. In   HB3399 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1developing contracts for the delivery of geothermal renewable 2energy credits, the Agency may establish fees applicable to 3each contract assignment. 4    Section 55. Utility cost recovery. The electric utility 5shall be entitled to recover all of its costs associated with 6the procurement of geothermal renewable energy credits under 7the Program. These costs shall include associated reasonable 8expenses for implementing the procurement Programs, including, 9but not limited to, the costs of administering and evaluating 10the Program through an automatic adjustment clause tariff. 11    Section 60. Extenuating circumstances. If, at any time, 12approved applications for the Program exceed funds collected 13by the electric utility or would cause the Agency to exceed the 14limitation on the amount of renewable energy resources that 15may be procured, then the Agency may consider future 16uncommitted funds to be reserved for these contracts on a 17first-come, first-served basis. 18    Notwithstanding other requirements of this Act, no 19modification shall be required to Program contracts if they 20were already executed prior to the establishment, approval, 21and implementation of new contract forms as a result of this 22Act. 23    Section 65. Illinois Power Agency administration.   HB3399 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    (a) The Agency shall strive to minimize administrative 2expenses in the implementation of the Program. The Agency may 3use any existing program administrator and any applicable 4subcontractors to develop, administer, implement, operate, and 5evaluate the Program.6    (b) If the Agency becomes aware of a circumstance that 7would warrant consideration of a mid-year renewable energy 8credit price adjustment, it shall conduct modeling of 9renewable energy credit pricing dynamics, in order to provide 10notice to stakeholders, and conduct a stakeholder feedback 11process before finalizing any changes. In line with the 12Illinois Power Agency Act, Program modifications to any block 13price that does not deviate from the Commission's approved 14value by more than 10% shall take effect immediately and are 15not subject to Commission review and approval. Program 16modifications to any block price that deviate more than 10% 17from the Commission's approved value shall be approved by the 18Commission as a long-term plan amendment under Section 1916-111.5 of the Public Utilities Act. 20    (c) In addition to covering the costs of Program 21administration, the Agency, in conjunction with its Program 22Administrator, may also use the proceeds of such fees charged 23to participating firms to support public education, labor 24training, and ongoing regional and national coordination with 25nonprofit organizations, public bodies, and others engaged in 26the implementation of geothermal heating and cooling system   HB3399 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1incentive Programs or similar initiatives. This work may 2include developing papers and reports, hosting regional and 3national conferences, and other work deemed necessary by the 4Agency to position the State as a national leader in renewable 5energy incentive Program development and administration. 6    (d) The Agency and its consultant or consultants shall 7monitor block activity, share Program activity with 8stakeholders, and conduct quarterly meetings to discuss 9Program activity and market conditions. If necessary, the 10Agency may make prospective administrative adjustments to 11Program design, such as making adjustments to purchase prices 12as necessary to achieve the goals of this Act. Program 13modifications to any block price that do not deviate from the 14Commission's approved value by more than 10% shall take effect 15immediately and are not subject to Commission review and 16approval. Program modifications to any block price that 17deviate more than 10% from the Commission's approved value 18shall be approved by the Commission as a long-term plan 19amendment. The Agency shall consider stakeholder feedback when 20making adjustments to Program design and shall notify 21stakeholders in advance of any planned changes. 22    (e) The Agency shall schedule regular meetings with 23representatives of the Attorney General, the Commission, 24consumer protection groups, and other interested stakeholders 25to share relevant information about consumer protection, 26project compliance, and complaints received.   HB3399 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    (f) To the extent that complaints received implicate the 2jurisdiction of the Attorney General, the Commission, or 3local, State, or federal law enforcement, the Agency shall 4also refer complaints to those entities as appropriate. 5    Section 70. Prohibition of double claiming geothermal 6renewable energy credits. Geothermal renewable energy credits 7retired by obligated utilities for compliance with the Program 8are only valid for compliance if those geothermal renewable 9energy credits have not been previously retired by another 10entity that is not the obligated utility on any tracking 11system, carbon registry, or other accounting mechanism at any 12time. Additionally, geothermal renewable energy credits 13retired by obligated utilities for compliance with the Program 14are only valid for compliance if those geothermal renewable 15energy credits have not been used to substantiate a public 16emissions or energy usage claim by any other another entity 17that is not the obligated utility, of any type and at any time, 18whether or not such geothermal renewable energy credits were 19actually retired on a tracking system, registry, or other 20accounting mechanism at the time of the public emissions-based 21claim. To that end, geothermal renewable energy credits 22generated for compliance with the Program are valid only if 23retired once, and claimed once, by the obligated utility. 24    Section 75. Cost recovery of generating units. In order to   HB3399 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1promote the competitive development of geothermal heating and 2cooling systems in furtherance of this State's interest in the 3health, safety, and welfare of its residents, renewable energy 4credits from geothermal heating and cooling systems shall not 5be eligible for purchase under this Act if the credits are 6sourced from a geothermal heating and cooling system for which 7costs are being recovered on or after the effective date of 8this Act through rates regulated by this State or any other 9state. 10    Section 900. The Illinois Power Agency Act is amended by 11changing Section 1-10 as follows: 12    (20 ILCS 3855/1-10)13    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. 14    "Agency" means the Illinois Power Agency.15    "Agency loan agreement" means any agreement pursuant to 16which the Illinois Finance Authority agrees to loan the 17proceeds of revenue bonds issued with respect to a project to 18the Agency upon terms providing for loan repayment 19installments at least sufficient to pay when due all principal 20of, interest and premium, if any, on those revenue bonds, and 21providing for maintenance, insurance, and other matters in 22respect of the project.23    "Authority" means the Illinois Finance Authority.24    "Brownfield site photovoltaic project" means photovoltaics   HB3399 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1that are either:2        (1) interconnected to an electric utility as defined 3    in this Section, a municipal utility as defined in this 4    Section, a public utility as defined in Section 3-105 of 5    the Public Utilities Act, or an electric cooperative as 6    defined in Section 3-119 of the Public Utilities Act and 7    located at a site that is regulated by any of the following 8    entities under the following programs:9            (A) the United States Environmental Protection 10        Agency under the federal Comprehensive Environmental 11        Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as 12        amended;13            (B) the United States Environmental Protection 14        Agency under the Corrective Action Program of the 15        federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, as 16        amended;17            (C) the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 18        under the Illinois Site Remediation Program; or19            (D) the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 20        under the Illinois Solid Waste Program; or 21        (2) located at the site of a coal mine that has 22    permanently ceased coal production, permanently halted any 23    re-mining operations, and is no longer accepting any coal 24    combustion residues; has both completed all clean-up and 25    remediation obligations under the federal Surface Mining 26    and Reclamation Act of 1977 and all applicable Illinois   HB3399 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    rules and any other clean-up, remediation, or ongoing 2    monitoring to safeguard the health and well-being of the 3    people of the State of Illinois, as well as demonstrated 4    compliance with all applicable federal and State 5    environmental rules and regulations, including, but not 6    limited, to 35 Ill. Adm. Code Part 845 and any rules for 7    historic fill of coal combustion residuals, including any 8    rules finalized in Subdocket A of Illinois Pollution 9    Control Board docket R2020-019. 10    "Clean coal facility" means an electric generating 11facility that uses primarily coal as a feedstock and that 12captures and sequesters carbon dioxide emissions at the 13following levels: at least 50% of the total carbon dioxide 14emissions that the facility would otherwise emit if, at the 15time construction commences, the facility is scheduled to 16commence operation before 2016, at least 70% of the total 17carbon dioxide emissions that the facility would otherwise 18emit if, at the time construction commences, the facility is 19scheduled to commence operation during 2016 or 2017, and at 20least 90% of the total carbon dioxide emissions that the 21facility would otherwise emit if, at the time construction 22commences, the facility is scheduled to commence operation 23after 2017. The power block of the clean coal facility shall 24not exceed allowable emission rates for sulfur dioxide, 25nitrogen oxides, carbon monoxide, particulates and mercury for 26a natural gas-fired combined-cycle facility the same size as   HB3399 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1and in the same location as the clean coal facility at the time 2the clean coal facility obtains an approved air permit. All 3coal used by a clean coal facility shall have high volatile 4bituminous rank and greater than 1.7 pounds of sulfur per 5million Btu content, unless the clean coal facility does not 6use gasification technology and was operating as a 7conventional coal-fired electric generating facility on June 81, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 95-1027). 9    "Clean coal SNG brownfield facility" means a facility that 10(1) has commenced construction by July 1, 2015 on an urban 11brownfield site in a municipality with at least 1,000,000 12residents; (2) uses a gasification process to produce 13substitute natural gas; (3) uses coal as at least 50% of the 14total feedstock over the term of any sourcing agreement with a 15utility and the remainder of the feedstock may be either 16petroleum coke or coal, with all such coal having a high 17bituminous rank and greater than 1.7 pounds of sulfur per 18million Btu content unless the facility reasonably determines 19that it is necessary to use additional petroleum coke to 20deliver additional consumer savings, in which case the 21facility shall use coal for at least 35% of the total feedstock 22over the term of any sourcing agreement; and (4) captures and 23sequesters at least 85% of the total carbon dioxide emissions 24that the facility would otherwise emit. 25    "Clean coal SNG facility" means a facility that uses a 26gasification process to produce substitute natural gas, that   HB3399 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1sequesters at least 90% of the total carbon dioxide emissions 2that the facility would otherwise emit, that uses at least 90% 3coal as a feedstock, with all such coal having a high 4bituminous rank and greater than 1.7 pounds of sulfur per 5million Btu content, and that has a valid and effective permit 6to construct emission sources and air pollution control 7equipment and approval with respect to the federal regulations 8for Prevention of Significant Deterioration of Air Quality 9(PSD) for the plant pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act; 10provided, however, a clean coal SNG brownfield facility shall 11not be a clean coal SNG facility. 12    "Clean energy" means energy generation that is 90% or 13greater free of carbon dioxide emissions. 14    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.15    "Community renewable generation project" means an electric 16generating facility that: 17        (1) is powered by wind, solar thermal energy, 18    photovoltaic cells or panels, biodiesel, crops and 19    untreated and unadulterated organic waste biomass, and 20    hydropower that does not involve new construction of dams; 21        (2) is interconnected at the distribution system level 22    of an electric utility as defined in this Section, a 23    municipal utility as defined in this Section that owns or 24    operates electric distribution facilities, a public 25    utility as defined in Section 3-105 of the Public 26    Utilities Act, or an electric cooperative, as defined in   HB3399 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    Section 3-119 of the Public Utilities Act;2        (3) credits the value of electricity generated by the 3    facility to the subscribers of the facility; and4        (4) is limited in nameplate capacity to less than or 5    equal to 5,000 kilowatts. 6    "Costs incurred in connection with the development and 7construction of a facility" means:8        (1) the cost of acquisition of all real property, 9    fixtures, and improvements in connection therewith and 10    equipment, personal property, and other property, rights, 11    and easements acquired that are deemed necessary for the 12    operation and maintenance of the facility;13        (2) financing costs with respect to bonds, notes, and 14    other evidences of indebtedness of the Agency;15        (3) all origination, commitment, utilization, 16    facility, placement, underwriting, syndication, credit 17    enhancement, and rating agency fees;18        (4) engineering, design, procurement, consulting, 19    legal, accounting, title insurance, survey, appraisal, 20    escrow, trustee, collateral agency, interest rate hedging, 21    interest rate swap, capitalized interest, contingency, as 22    required by lenders, and other financing costs, and other 23    expenses for professional services; and24        (5) the costs of plans, specifications, site study and 25    investigation, installation, surveys, other Agency costs 26    and estimates of costs, and other expenses necessary or   HB3399 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    incidental to determining the feasibility of any project, 2    together with such other expenses as may be necessary or 3    incidental to the financing, insuring, acquisition, and 4    construction of a specific project and starting up, 5    commissioning, and placing that project in operation. 6    "Delivery services" has the same definition as found in 7Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities Act. 8    "Delivery year" means the consecutive 12-month period 9beginning June 1 of a given year and ending May 31 of the 10following year. 11    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 12Opportunity.13    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois Power 14Agency.15    "Demand-response" means measures that decrease peak 16electricity demand or shift demand from peak to off-peak 17periods.18    "Distributed renewable energy generation device" means a 19device that is:20        (1) powered by wind, solar thermal energy, 21    photovoltaic cells or panels, biodiesel, crops and 22    untreated and unadulterated organic waste biomass, tree 23    waste, and hydropower that does not involve new 24    construction of dams, waste heat to power systems, or 25    qualified combined heat and power systems; 26        (2) interconnected at the distribution system level of   HB3399 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    either an electric utility as defined in this Section, a 2    municipal utility as defined in this Section that owns or 3    operates electric distribution facilities, or a rural 4    electric cooperative as defined in Section 3-119 of the 5    Public Utilities Act; 6        (3) located on the customer side of the customer's 7    electric meter and is primarily used to offset that 8    customer's electricity load; and9        (4) (blank). 10    "Energy efficiency" means measures that reduce the amount 11of electricity or natural gas consumed in order to achieve a 12given end use. "Energy efficiency" includes voltage 13optimization measures that optimize the voltage at points on 14the electric distribution voltage system and thereby reduce 15electricity consumption by electric customers' end use 16devices. "Energy efficiency" also includes measures that 17reduce the total Btus of electricity, natural gas, and other 18fuels needed to meet the end use or uses. 19    "Electric utility" has the same definition as found in 20Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities Act.21    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 22community" are synonymous and mean the geographic areas 23throughout Illinois which would most benefit from equitable 24investments by the State designed to combat discrimination. 25Specifically, the eligible communities shall be defined as the 26following areas:  HB3399 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1        (1) R3 Areas as established pursuant to Section 10-40 2    of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act, where residents 3    have historically been excluded from economic 4    opportunities, including opportunities in the energy 5    sector; and6        (2) environmental justice communities, as defined by 7    the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 8    Agency Act, where residents have historically been subject 9    to disproportionate burdens of pollution, including 10    pollution from the energy sector.11    "Equity eligible persons" or "eligible persons" means 12persons who would most benefit from equitable investments by 13the State designed to combat discrimination, specifically:14        (1) persons who graduate from or are current or former 15    participants in the Clean Jobs Workforce Network Program, 16    the Clean Energy Contractor Incubator Program, the 17    Illinois Climate Works Preapprenticeship Program, 18    Returning Residents Clean Jobs Training Program, or the 19    Clean Energy Primes Contractor Accelerator Program, and 20    the solar training pipeline and multi-cultural jobs 21    program created in paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(3) of Section 22    16-208.12 of the Public Utilities Act;23        (2) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 24    in the foster care system;25        (3) persons who were formerly incarcerated;26        (4) persons whose primary residence is in an equity   HB3399 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    investment eligible community.2    "Equity eligible contractor" means a business that is 3majority-owned by eligible persons, or a nonprofit or 4cooperative that is majority-governed by eligible persons, or 5is a natural person that is an eligible person offering 6personal services as an independent contractor. 7    "Facility" means an electric generating unit or a 8co-generating unit that produces electricity along with 9related equipment necessary to connect the facility to an 10electric transmission or distribution system.11    "General contractor" means the entity or organization with 12main responsibility for the building of a construction project 13and who is the party signing the prime construction contract 14for the project. 15    "Governmental aggregator" means one or more units of local 16government that individually or collectively procure 17electricity to serve residential retail electrical loads 18located within its or their jurisdiction.19    "High voltage direct current converter station" means the 20collection of equipment that converts direct current energy 21from a high voltage direct current transmission line into 22alternating current using Voltage Source Conversion technology 23and that is interconnected with transmission or distribution 24assets located in Illinois.25    "High voltage direct current renewable energy credit" 26means a renewable energy credit associated with a renewable   HB3399 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1energy resource where the renewable energy resource has 2entered into a contract to transmit the energy associated with 3such renewable energy credit over high voltage direct current 4transmission facilities. 5    "High voltage direct current transmission facilities" 6means the collection of installed equipment that converts 7alternating current energy in one location to direct current 8and transmits that direct current energy to a high voltage 9direct current converter station using Voltage Source 10Conversion technology. "High voltage direct current 11transmission facilities" includes the high voltage direct 12current converter station itself and associated high voltage 13direct current transmission lines. Notwithstanding the 14preceding, after September 15, 2021 (the effective date of 15Public Act 102-662), an otherwise qualifying collection of 16equipment does not qualify as high voltage direct current 17transmission facilities unless its developer entered into a 18project labor agreement, is capable of transmitting 19electricity at 525kv with an Illinois converter station 20located and interconnected in the region of the PJM 21Interconnection, LLC, and the system does not operate as a 22public utility, as that term is defined in Section 3-105 of the 23Public Utilities Act.24    "Hydropower" means any method of electricity generation or 25storage that results from the flow of water, including 26impoundment facilities, diversion facilities, and pumped   HB3399 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1storage facilities. 2    "Index price" means the real-time energy settlement price 3at the applicable Illinois trading hub, such as PJM-NIHUB or 4MISO-IL, for a given settlement period.5    "Indexed renewable energy credit" means a tradable credit 6that represents the environmental attributes of one megawatt 7hour of energy produced from a renewable energy resource, the 8price of which shall be calculated by subtracting the strike 9price offered by a new utility-scale wind project or a new 10utility-scale photovoltaic project from the index price in a 11given settlement period. 12    "Indexed renewable energy credit counterparty" has the 13same meaning as "public utility" as defined in Section 3-105 14of the Public Utilities Act.15    "Local government" means a unit of local government as 16defined in Section 1 of Article VII of the Illinois 17Constitution.18    "Modernized" or "retooled" means the construction, repair, 19maintenance, or significant expansion of turbines and existing 20hydropower dams. 21    "Municipality" means a city, village, or incorporated 22town.23    "Municipal utility" means a public utility owned and 24operated by any subdivision or municipal corporation of this 25State. 26    "Nameplate capacity" means the aggregate inverter   HB3399 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1nameplate capacity in kilowatts AC. 2    "Person" means any natural person, firm, partnership, 3corporation, either domestic or foreign, company, association, 4limited liability company, joint stock company, or association 5and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or personal 6representative thereof.7    "Project" means the planning, bidding, and construction of 8a facility.9    "Project labor agreement" means a pre-hire collective 10bargaining agreement that covers all terms and conditions of 11employment on a specific construction project and must include 12the following:13        (1) provisions establishing the minimum hourly wage 14    for each class of labor organization employee;15        (2) provisions establishing the benefits and other 16    compensation for each class of labor organization 17    employee;18        (3) provisions establishing that no strike or disputes 19    will be engaged in by the labor organization employees;20        (4) provisions establishing that no lockout or 21    disputes will be engaged in by the general contractor 22    building the project; and23        (5) provisions for minorities and women, as defined 24    under the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and 25    Persons with Disabilities Act, setting forth goals for 26    apprenticeship hours to be performed by minorities and   HB3399 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    women and setting forth goals for total hours to be 2    performed by underrepresented minorities and women.3    A labor organization and the general contractor building 4the project shall have the authority to include other terms 5and conditions as they deem necessary. 6    "Public utility" has the same definition as found in 7Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act.8    "Qualified combined heat and power systems" means systems 9that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produce 10electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 11source. Such systems are eligible for "renewable energy 12credits" in an amount equal to its total energy output where a 13renewable fuel is consumed or in an amount equal to the net 14reduction in nonrenewable fuel consumed on a total energy 15output basis. 16    "Real property" means any interest in land together with 17all structures, fixtures, and improvements thereon, including 18lands under water and riparian rights, any easements, 19covenants, licenses, leases, rights-of-way, uses, and other 20interests, together with any liens, judgments, mortgages, or 21other claims or security interests related to real property.22    "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable credit that 23represents the environmental attributes of one megawatt hour 24of energy produced from a renewable energy resource.25    "Renewable energy resources" includes energy and its 26associated renewable energy credit or renewable energy credits   HB3399 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1from wind, solar thermal energy, photovoltaic cells and 2panels, biodiesel, anaerobic digestion, crops and untreated 3and unadulterated organic waste biomass, and hydropower that 4does not involve new construction of dams, waste heat to power 5systems, or qualified combined heat and power systems, or 6geothermal heating and cooling systems as defined in the 7Geothermal Homes and Businesses Act. For purposes of this Act, 8landfill gas produced in the State is considered a renewable 9energy resource. "Renewable energy resources" does not include 10the incineration or burning of tires, garbage, general 11household, institutional, and commercial waste, industrial 12lunchroom or office waste, landscape waste, railroad 13crossties, utility poles, or construction or demolition 14debris, other than untreated and unadulterated waste wood. 15"Renewable energy resources" also includes high voltage direct 16current renewable energy credits and the associated energy 17converted to alternating current by a high voltage direct 18current converter station to the extent that: (1) the 19generator of such renewable energy resource contracted with a 20third party to transmit the energy over the high voltage 21direct current transmission facilities, and (2) the 22third-party contracting for delivery of renewable energy 23resources over the high voltage direct current transmission 24facilities have ownership rights over the unretired associated 25high voltage direct current renewable energy credit. 26    "Retail customer" has the same definition as found in   HB3399 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities Act. 2    "Revenue bond" means any bond, note, or other evidence of 3indebtedness issued by the Authority, the principal and 4interest of which is payable solely from revenues or income 5derived from any project or activity of the Agency.6    "Sequester" means permanent storage of carbon dioxide by 7injecting it into a saline aquifer, a depleted gas reservoir, 8or an oil reservoir, directly or through an enhanced oil 9recovery process that may involve intermediate storage, 10regardless of whether these activities are conducted by a 11clean coal facility, a clean coal SNG facility, a clean coal 12SNG brownfield facility, or a party with which a clean coal 13facility, clean coal SNG facility, or clean coal SNG 14brownfield facility has contracted for such purposes. 15    "Service area" has the same definition as found in Section 1616-102 of the Public Utilities Act. 17    "Settlement period" means the period of time utilized by 18MISO and PJM and their successor organizations as the basis 19for settlement calculations in the real-time energy market. 20    "Sourcing agreement" means (i) in the case of an electric 21utility, an agreement between the owner of a clean coal 22facility and such electric utility, which agreement shall have 23terms and conditions meeting the requirements of paragraph (3) 24of subsection (d) of Section 1-75, (ii) in the case of an 25alternative retail electric supplier, an agreement between the 26owner of a clean coal facility and such alternative retail   HB3399 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1electric supplier, which agreement shall have terms and 2conditions meeting the requirements of Section 16-115(d)(5) of 3the Public Utilities Act, and (iii) in case of a gas utility, 4an agreement between the owner of a clean coal SNG brownfield 5facility and the gas utility, which agreement shall have the 6terms and conditions meeting the requirements of subsection 7(h-1) of Section 9-220 of the Public Utilities Act. 8    "Strike price" means a contract price for energy and 9renewable energy credits from a new utility-scale wind project 10or a new utility-scale photovoltaic project. 11    "Subscriber" means a person who (i) takes delivery service 12from an electric utility, and (ii) has a subscription of no 13less than 200 watts to a community renewable generation 14project that is located in the electric utility's service 15area. No subscriber's subscriptions may total more than 40% of 16the nameplate capacity of an individual community renewable 17generation project. Entities that are affiliated by virtue of 18a common parent shall not represent multiple subscriptions 19that total more than 40% of the nameplate capacity of an 20individual community renewable generation project.21    "Subscription" means an interest in a community renewable 22generation project expressed in kilowatts, which is sized 23primarily to offset part or all of the subscriber's 24electricity usage. 25    "Substitute natural gas" or "SNG" means a gas manufactured 26by gasification of hydrocarbon feedstock, which is   HB3399 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1substantially interchangeable in use and distribution with 2conventional natural gas. 3    "Total resource cost test" or "TRC test" means a standard 4that is met if, for an investment in energy efficiency or 5demand-response measures, the benefit-cost ratio is greater 6than one. The benefit-cost ratio is the ratio of the net 7present value of the total benefits of the program to the net 8present value of the total costs as calculated over the 9lifetime of the measures. A total resource cost test compares 10the sum of avoided electric utility costs, representing the 11benefits that accrue to the system and the participant in the 12delivery of those efficiency measures and including avoided 13costs associated with reduced use of natural gas or other 14fuels, avoided costs associated with reduced water 15consumption, and avoided costs associated with reduced 16operation and maintenance costs, as well as other quantifiable 17societal benefits, to the sum of all incremental costs of 18end-use measures that are implemented due to the program 19(including both utility and participant contributions), plus 20costs to administer, deliver, and evaluate each demand-side 21program, to quantify the net savings obtained by substituting 22the demand-side program for supply resources. In calculating 23avoided costs of power and energy that an electric utility 24would otherwise have had to acquire, reasonable estimates 25shall be included of financial costs likely to be imposed by 26future regulations and legislation on emissions of greenhouse   HB3399 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1gases. In discounting future societal costs and benefits for 2the purpose of calculating net present values, a societal 3discount rate based on actual, long-term Treasury bond yields 4should be used. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, the 5TRC test shall not include or take into account a calculation 6of market price suppression effects or demand reduction 7induced price effects. 8    "Utility-scale solar project" means an electric generating 9facility that:10        (1) generates electricity using photovoltaic cells; 11    and12        (2) has a nameplate capacity that is greater than 13    5,000 kilowatts. 14    "Utility-scale wind project" means an electric generating 15facility that:16        (1) generates electricity using wind; and17        (2) has a nameplate capacity that is greater than 18    5,000 kilowatts. 19    "Waste Heat to Power Systems" means systems that capture 20and generate electricity from energy that would otherwise be 21lost to the atmosphere without the use of additional fuel. 22    "Zero emission credit" means a tradable credit that 23represents the environmental attributes of one megawatt hour 24of energy produced from a zero emission facility.25    "Zero emission facility" means a facility that: (1) is 26fueled by nuclear power; and (2) is interconnected with PJM   HB3399 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1Interconnection, LLC or the Midcontinent Independent System 2Operator, Inc., or their successors.3(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 103-154, eff. 6-28-23; 4103-380, eff. 1-1-24.) 5    Section 905. The Public Utilities Act is amended by 6changing Sections 16-108 and 16-111.5 as follows: 7    (220 ILCS 5/16-108)8    Sec. 16-108. Recovery of costs associated with the 9provision of delivery and other services.10    (a) An electric utility shall file a delivery services 11tariff with the Commission at least 210 days prior to the date 12that it is required to begin offering such services pursuant 13to this Act. An electric utility shall provide the components 14of delivery services that are subject to the jurisdiction of 15the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission at the same prices, 16terms and conditions set forth in its applicable tariff as 17approved or allowed into effect by that Commission. The 18Commission shall otherwise have the authority pursuant to 19Article IX to review, approve, and modify the prices, terms 20and conditions of those components of delivery services not 21subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory 22Commission, including the authority to determine the extent to 23which such delivery services should be offered on an unbundled 24basis. In making any such determination the Commission shall   HB3399 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1consider, at a minimum, the effect of additional unbundling on 2(i) the objective of just and reasonable rates, (ii) electric 3utility employees, and (iii) the development of competitive 4markets for electric energy services in Illinois.5    (b) The Commission shall enter an order approving, or 6approving as modified, the delivery services tariff no later 7than 30 days prior to the date on which the electric utility 8must commence offering such services. The Commission may 9subsequently modify such tariff pursuant to this Act.10    (c) The electric utility's tariffs shall define the 11classes of its customers for purposes of delivery services 12charges. Delivery services shall be priced and made available 13to all retail customers electing delivery services in each 14such class on a nondiscriminatory basis regardless of whether 15the retail customer chooses the electric utility, an affiliate 16of the electric utility, or another entity as its supplier of 17electric power and energy. Charges for delivery services shall 18be cost based, and shall allow the electric utility to recover 19the costs of providing delivery services through its charges 20to its delivery service customers that use the facilities and 21services associated with such costs. Such costs shall include 22the costs of owning, operating and maintaining transmission 23and distribution facilities. The Commission shall also be 24authorized to consider whether, and if so to what extent, the 25following costs are appropriately included in the electric 26utility's delivery services rates: (i) the costs of that   HB3399 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1portion of generation facilities used for the production and 2absorption of reactive power in order that retail customers 3located in the electric utility's service area can receive 4electric power and energy from suppliers other than the 5electric utility, and (ii) the costs associated with the use 6and redispatch of generation facilities to mitigate 7constraints on the transmission or distribution system in 8order that retail customers located in the electric utility's 9service area can receive electric power and energy from 10suppliers other than the electric utility. Nothing in this 11subsection shall be construed as directing the Commission to 12allocate any of the costs described in (i) or (ii) that are 13found to be appropriately included in the electric utility's 14delivery services rates to any particular customer group or 15geographic area in setting delivery services rates.16    (d) The Commission shall establish charges, terms and 17conditions for delivery services that are just and reasonable 18and shall take into account customer impacts when establishing 19such charges. In establishing charges, terms and conditions 20for delivery services, the Commission shall take into account 21voltage level differences. A retail customer shall have the 22option to request to purchase electric service at any delivery 23service voltage reasonably and technically feasible from the 24electric facilities serving that customer's premises provided 25that there are no significant adverse impacts upon system 26reliability or system efficiency. A retail customer shall also   HB3399 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1have the option to request to purchase electric service at any 2point of delivery that is reasonably and technically feasible 3provided that there are no significant adverse impacts on 4system reliability or efficiency. Such requests shall not be 5unreasonably denied.6    (e) Electric utilities shall recover the costs of 7installing, operating or maintaining facilities for the 8particular benefit of one or more delivery services customers, 9including without limitation any costs incurred in complying 10with a customer's request to be served at a different voltage 11level, directly from the retail customer or customers for 12whose benefit the costs were incurred, to the extent such 13costs are not recovered through the charges referred to in 14subsections (c) and (d) of this Section.15    (f) An electric utility shall be entitled but not required 16to implement transition charges in conjunction with the 17offering of delivery services pursuant to Section 16-104. If 18an electric utility implements transition charges, it shall 19implement such charges for all delivery services customers and 20for all customers described in subsection (h), but shall not 21implement transition charges for power and energy that a 22retail customer takes from cogeneration or self-generation 23facilities located on that retail customer's premises, if such 24facilities meet the following criteria: 25        (i) the cogeneration or self-generation facilities 26    serve a single retail customer and are located on that   HB3399 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    retail customer's premises (for purposes of this 2    subparagraph and subparagraph (ii), an industrial or 3    manufacturing retail customer and a third party contractor 4    that is served by such industrial or manufacturing 5    customer through such retail customer's own electrical 6    distribution facilities under the circumstances described 7    in subsection (vi) of the definition of "alternative 8    retail electric supplier" set forth in Section 16-102, 9    shall be considered a single retail customer); 10        (ii) the cogeneration or self-generation facilities 11    either (A) are sized pursuant to generally accepted 12    engineering standards for the retail customer's electrical 13    load at that premises (taking into account standby or 14    other reliability considerations related to that retail 15    customer's operations at that site) or (B) if the facility 16    is a cogeneration facility located on the retail 17    customer's premises, the retail customer is the thermal 18    host for that facility and the facility has been designed 19    to meet that retail customer's thermal energy requirements 20    resulting in electrical output beyond that retail 21    customer's electrical demand at that premises, comply with 22    the operating and efficiency standards applicable to 23    "qualifying facilities" specified in title 18 Code of 24    Federal Regulations Section 292.205 as in effect on the 25    effective date of this amendatory Act of 1999; 26        (iii) the retail customer on whose premises the   HB3399 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    facilities are located either has an exclusive right to 2    receive, and corresponding obligation to pay for, all of 3    the electrical capacity of the facility, or in the case of 4    a cogeneration facility that has been designed to meet the 5    retail customer's thermal energy requirements at that 6    premises, an identified amount of the electrical capacity 7    of the facility, over a minimum 5-year period; and 8        (iv) if the cogeneration facility is sized for the 9    retail customer's thermal load at that premises but 10    exceeds the electrical load, any sales of excess power or 11    energy are made only at wholesale, are subject to the 12    jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, 13    and are not for the purpose of circumventing the 14    provisions of this subsection (f).15If a generation facility located at a retail customer's 16premises does not meet the above criteria, an electric utility 17implementing transition charges shall implement a transition 18charge until December 31, 2006 for any power and energy taken 19by such retail customer from such facility as if such power and 20energy had been delivered by the electric utility. Provided, 21however, that an industrial retail customer that is taking 22power from a generation facility that does not meet the above 23criteria but that is located on such customer's premises will 24not be subject to a transition charge for the power and energy 25taken by such retail customer from such generation facility if 26the facility does not serve any other retail customer and   HB3399 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1either was installed on behalf of the customer and for its own 2use prior to January 1, 1997, or is both predominantly fueled 3by byproducts of such customer's manufacturing process at such 4premises and sells or offers an average of 300 megawatts or 5more of electricity produced from such generation facility 6into the wholesale market. Such charges shall be calculated as 7provided in Section 16-102, and shall be collected on each 8kilowatt-hour delivered under a delivery services tariff to a 9retail customer from the date the customer first takes 10delivery services until December 31, 2006 except as provided 11in subsection (h) of this Section. Provided, however, that an 12electric utility, other than an electric utility providing 13service to at least 1,000,000 customers in this State on 14January 1, 1999, shall be entitled to petition for entry of an 15order by the Commission authorizing the electric utility to 16implement transition charges for an additional period ending 17no later than December 31, 2008. The electric utility shall 18file its petition with supporting evidence no earlier than 16 19months, and no later than 12 months, prior to December 31, 202006. The Commission shall hold a hearing on the electric 21utility's petition and shall enter its order no later than 8 22months after the petition is filed. The Commission shall 23determine whether and to what extent the electric utility 24shall be authorized to implement transition charges for an 25additional period. The Commission may authorize the electric 26utility to implement transition charges for some or all of the   HB3399 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1additional period, and shall determine the mitigation factors 2to be used in implementing such transition charges; provided, 3that the Commission shall not authorize mitigation factors 4less than 110% of those in effect during the 12 months ended 5December 31, 2006. In making its determination, the Commission 6shall consider the following factors: the necessity to 7implement transition charges for an additional period in order 8to maintain the financial integrity of the electric utility; 9the prudence of the electric utility's actions in reducing its 10costs since the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1997; 11the ability of the electric utility to provide safe, adequate 12and reliable service to retail customers in its service area; 13and the impact on competition of allowing the electric utility 14to implement transition charges for the additional period.15    (g) The electric utility shall file tariffs that establish 16the transition charges to be paid by each class of customers to 17the electric utility in conjunction with the provision of 18delivery services. The electric utility's tariffs shall define 19the classes of its customers for purposes of calculating 20transition charges. The electric utility's tariffs shall 21provide for the calculation of transition charges on a 22customer-specific basis for any retail customer whose average 23monthly maximum electrical demand on the electric utility's 24system during the 6 months with the customer's highest monthly 25maximum electrical demands equals or exceeds 3.0 megawatts for 26electric utilities having more than 1,000,000 customers, and   HB3399 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1for other electric utilities for any customer that has an 2average monthly maximum electrical demand on the electric 3utility's system of one megawatt or more, and (A) for which 4there exists data on the customer's usage during the 3 years 5preceding the date that the customer became eligible to take 6delivery services, or (B) for which there does not exist data 7on the customer's usage during the 3 years preceding the date 8that the customer became eligible to take delivery services, 9if in the electric utility's reasonable judgment there exists 10comparable usage information or a sufficient basis to develop 11such information, and further provided that the electric 12utility can require customers for which an individual 13calculation is made to sign contracts that set forth the 14transition charges to be paid by the customer to the electric 15utility pursuant to the tariff.16    (h) An electric utility shall also be entitled to file 17tariffs that allow it to collect transition charges from 18retail customers in the electric utility's service area that 19do not take delivery services but that take electric power or 20energy from an alternative retail electric supplier or from an 21electric utility other than the electric utility in whose 22service area the customer is located. Such charges shall be 23calculated, in accordance with the definition of transition 24charges in Section 16-102, for the period of time that the 25customer would be obligated to pay transition charges if it 26were taking delivery services, except that no deduction for   HB3399 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1delivery services revenues shall be made in such calculation, 2and usage data from the customer's class shall be used where 3historical usage data is not available for the individual 4customer. The customer shall be obligated to pay such charges 5on a lump sum basis on or before the date on which the customer 6commences to take service from the alternative retail electric 7supplier or other electric utility, provided, that the 8electric utility in whose service area the customer is located 9shall offer the customer the option of signing a contract 10pursuant to which the customer pays such charges ratably over 11the period in which the charges would otherwise have applied.12    (i) An electric utility shall be entitled to add to the 13bills of delivery services customers charges pursuant to 14Sections 9-221, 9-222 (except as provided in Section 9-222.1), 15and Section 16-114 of this Act, Section 5-5 of the Electricity 16Infrastructure Maintenance Fee Law, Section 6-5 of the 17Renewable Energy, Energy Efficiency, and Coal Resources 18Development Law of 1997, and Section 13 of the Energy 19Assistance Act.20    (i-5) An electric utility required to impose the Coal to 21Solar and Energy Storage Initiative Charge provided for in 22subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 23Act shall add such charge to the bills of its delivery services 24customers pursuant to the terms of a tariff conforming to the 25requirements of subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the 26Illinois Power Agency Act and this subsection (i-5) and filed   HB3399 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1with and approved by the Commission. The electric utility 2shall file its proposed tariff with the Commission on or 3before July 1, 2022 to be effective, after review and approval 4or modification by the Commission, beginning January 1, 2023. 5On or before December 1, 2022, the Commission shall review the 6electric utility's proposed tariff, including by conducting a 7docketed proceeding if deemed necessary by the Commission, and 8shall approve the proposed tariff or direct the electric 9utility to make modifications the Commission finds necessary 10for the tariff to conform to the requirements of subsection 11(c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act and this 12subsection (i-5). The electric utility's tariff shall provide 13for imposition of the Coal to Solar and Energy Storage 14Initiative Charge on a per-kilowatthour basis to all 15kilowatthours delivered by the electric utility to its 16delivery services customers. The tariff shall provide for the 17calculation of the Coal to Solar and Energy Storage Initiative 18Charge to be in effect for the year beginning January 1, 2023 19and each year beginning January 1 thereafter, sufficient to 20collect the electric utility's estimated payment obligations 21for the delivery year beginning the following June 1 under 22contracts for purchase of renewable energy credits entered 23into pursuant to subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the 24Illinois Power Agency Act and the obligations of the 25Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, or any 26successor department or agency, which for purposes of this   HB3399 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1subsection (i-5) shall be referred to as the Department, to 2make grant payments during such delivery year from the Coal to 3Solar and Energy Storage Initiative Fund pursuant to grant 4contracts entered into pursuant to subsection (c-5) of Section 51-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act, and using the electric 6utility's kilowatthour deliveries to its delivery services 7customers during the delivery year ended May 31 of the 8preceding calendar year. On or before November 1 of each year 9beginning November 1, 2022, the Department shall notify the 10electric utilities of the amount of the Department's estimated 11obligations for grant payments during the delivery year 12beginning the following June 1 pursuant to grant contracts 13entered into pursuant to subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of 14the Illinois Power Agency Act; and each electric utility shall 15incorporate in the calculation of its Coal to Solar and Energy 16Storage Initiative Charge the fractional portion of the 17Department's estimated obligations equal to the electric 18utility's kilowatthour deliveries to its delivery services 19customers in the delivery year ended the preceding May 31 20divided by the aggregate deliveries of both electric utilities 21to delivery services customers in such delivery year. The 22electric utility shall remit on a monthly basis to the State 23Treasurer, for deposit in the Coal to Solar and Energy Storage 24Initiative Fund provided for in subsection (c-5) of Section 251-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act, the electric utility's 26collections of the Coal to Solar and Energy Storage Initiative   HB3399 Engrossed- 47 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1Charge estimated to be needed by the Department for grant 2payments pursuant to grant contracts entered into pursuant to 3subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 4Act. The initial charge under the electric utility's tariff 5shall be effective for kilowatthours delivered beginning 6January 1, 2023, and thereafter shall be revised to be 7effective January 1, 2024 and each January 1 thereafter, based 8on the payment obligations for the delivery year beginning the 9following June 1. The tariff shall provide for the electric 10utility to make an annual filing with the Commission on or 11before November 15 of each year, beginning in 2023, setting 12forth the Coal to Solar and Energy Storage Initiative Charge 13to be in effect for the year beginning the following January 1. 14The electric utility's tariff shall also provide that the 15electric utility shall make a filing with the Commission on or 16before August 1 of each year beginning in 2024 setting forth a 17reconciliation, for the delivery year ended the preceding May 1831, of the electric utility's collections of the Coal to Solar 19and Energy Storage Initiative Charge against actual payments 20for renewable energy credits pursuant to contracts entered 21into, and the actual grant payments by the Department pursuant 22to grant contracts entered into, pursuant to subsection (c-5) 23of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act. The tariff 24shall provide that any excess or shortfall of collections to 25payments shall be deducted from or added to, on a 26per-kilowatthour basis, the Coal to Solar and Energy Storage   HB3399 Engrossed- 48 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1Initiative Charge, over the 6-month period beginning October 1 2of that calendar year. 3    (j) If a retail customer that obtains electric power and 4energy from cogeneration or self-generation facilities 5installed for its own use on or before January 1, 1997, 6subsequently takes service from an alternative retail electric 7supplier or an electric utility other than the electric 8utility in whose service area the customer is located for any 9portion of the customer's electric power and energy 10requirements formerly obtained from those facilities 11(including that amount purchased from the utility in lieu of 12such generation and not as standby power purchases, under a 13cogeneration displacement tariff in effect as of the effective 14date of this amendatory Act of 1997), the transition charges 15otherwise applicable pursuant to subsections (f), (g), or (h) 16of this Section shall not be applicable in any year to that 17portion of the customer's electric power and energy 18requirements formerly obtained from those facilities, 19provided, that for purposes of this subsection (j), such 20portion shall not exceed the average number of kilowatt-hours 21per year obtained from the cogeneration or self-generation 22facilities during the 3 years prior to the date on which the 23customer became eligible for delivery services, except as 24provided in subsection (f) of Section 16-110.25    (k) The electric utility shall be entitled to recover 26through tariffed charges all of the costs associated with the   HB3399 Engrossed- 49 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1purchase of zero emission credits from zero emission 2facilities to meet the requirements of subsection (d-5) of 3Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act and all of the 4costs associated with the purchase of carbon mitigation 5credits from carbon-free energy resources to meet the 6requirements of subsection (d-10) of Section 1-75 of the 7Illinois Power Agency Act. Such costs shall include the costs 8of procuring the zero emission credits and carbon mitigation 9credits from carbon-free energy resources, as well as the 10reasonable costs that the utility incurs as part of the 11procurement processes and to implement and comply with plans 12and processes approved by the Commission under subsections 13(d-5) and (d-10). The costs shall be allocated across all 14retail customers through a single, uniform cents per 15kilowatt-hour charge applicable to all retail customers, which 16shall appear as a separate line item on each customer's bill. 17Beginning June 1, 2017, the electric utility shall be entitled 18to recover through tariffed charges all of the costs 19associated with the purchase of renewable energy resources to 20meet the renewable energy resource standards of subsection (c) 21of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act, under 22procurement plans as approved in accordance with that Section 23and Section 16-111.5 of this Act. Such costs shall include the 24costs of procuring the renewable energy resources, as well as 25the reasonable costs that the utility incurs as part of the 26procurement processes and to implement and comply with plans   HB3399 Engrossed- 50 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1and processes approved by the Commission under such Sections. 2The costs associated with the purchase of renewable energy 3resources shall be allocated across all retail customers in 4proportion to the amount of renewable energy resources the 5utility procures for such customers through a single, uniform 6cents per kilowatt-hour charge applicable to such retail 7customers, which shall appear as a separate line item on each 8such customer's bill. The credits, costs, and penalties 9associated with the self-direct renewable portfolio standard 10compliance program described in subparagraph (R) of paragraph 11(1) of subsection (c) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 12Agency Act shall be allocated to approved eligible self-direct 13customers by the utility in a cents per kilowatt-hour credit, 14cost, or penalty, which shall appear as a separate line item on 15each such customer's bill. 16    Notwithstanding whether the Commission has approved the 17initial long-term renewable resources procurement plan as of 18June 1, 2017, an electric utility shall place new tariffed 19charges into effect beginning with the June 2017 monthly 20billing period, to the extent practicable, to begin recovering 21the costs of procuring renewable energy resources, as those 22charges are calculated under the limitations described in 23subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of Section 241-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act. Notwithstanding the 25date on which the utility places such new tariffed charges 26into effect, the utility shall be permitted to collect the   HB3399 Engrossed- 51 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1charges under such tariff as if the tariff had been in effect 2beginning with the first day of the June 2017 monthly billing 3period. For the delivery years commencing June 1, 2017, June 41, 2018, June 1, 2019, and each delivery year thereafter, the 5electric utility shall deposit into a separate interest 6bearing account of a financial institution the monies 7collected under the tariffed charges. Money collected from 8customers for the procurement of renewable energy resources in 9a given delivery year may be spent by the utility for the 10procurement of renewable resources over any of the following 5 11delivery years, after which unspent money shall be credited 12back to retail customers. The electric utility shall spend all 13money collected in earlier delivery years that has not yet 14been returned to customers, first, before spending money 15collected in later delivery years. Any interest earned shall 16be credited back to retail customers under the reconciliation 17proceeding provided for in this subsection (k), provided that 18the electric utility shall first be reimbursed from the 19interest for the administrative costs that it incurs to 20administer and manage the account. Any taxes due on the funds 21in the account, or interest earned on it, will be paid from the 22account or, if insufficient monies are available in the 23account, from the monies collected under the tariffed charges 24to recover the costs of procuring renewable energy resources. 25Monies deposited in the account shall be subject to the 26review, reconciliation, and true-up process described in this   HB3399 Engrossed- 52 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1subsection (k) that is applicable to the funds collected and 2costs incurred for the procurement of renewable energy 3resources.4    The electric utility shall be entitled to recover all of 5the costs identified in this subsection (k) through automatic 6adjustment clause tariffs applicable to all of the utility's 7retail customers that allow the electric utility to adjust its 8tariffed charges consistent with this subsection (k). The 9determination as to whether any excess funds were collected 10during a given delivery year for the purchase of renewable 11energy resources, and the crediting of any excess funds back 12to retail customers, shall not be made until after the close of 13the delivery year, which will ensure that the maximum amount 14of funds is available to implement the approved long-term 15renewable resources procurement plan during a given delivery 16year. The amount of excess funds eligible to be credited back 17to retail customers shall be reduced by an amount equal to the 18payment obligations required by any contracts entered into by 19an electric utility under contracts described in subsection 20(b) of Section 1-56 and subsection (c) of Section 1-75 of the 21Illinois Power Agency Act, even if such payments have not yet 22been made and regardless of the delivery year in which those 23payment obligations were incurred. Notwithstanding anything to 24the contrary, including in tariffs authorized by this 25subsection (k) in effect before the effective date of this 26amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, all unspent   HB3399 Engrossed- 53 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1funds as of May 31, 2021, excluding any funds credited to 2customers during any utility billing cycle that commences 3prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 4General Assembly, shall remain in the utility account and 5shall on a first in, first out basis be used toward utility 6payment obligations under contracts described in subsection 7(b) of Section 1-56 and subsection (c) of Section 1-75 of the 8Illinois Power Agency Act. The electric utility's collections 9under such automatic adjustment clause tariffs to recover the 10costs of renewable energy resources, zero emission credits 11from zero emission facilities, and carbon mitigation credits 12from carbon-free energy resources shall be subject to separate 13annual review, reconciliation, and true-up against actual 14costs by the Commission under a procedure that shall be 15specified in the electric utility's automatic adjustment 16clause tariffs and that shall be approved by the Commission in 17connection with its approval of such tariffs. The procedure 18shall provide that any difference between the electric 19utility's collections for zero emission credits and carbon 20mitigation credits under the automatic adjustment charges for 21an annual period and the electric utility's actual costs of 22zero emission credits from zero emission facilities and carbon 23mitigation credits from carbon-free energy resources for that 24same annual period shall be refunded to or collected from, as 25applicable, the electric utility's retail customers in 26subsequent periods.  HB3399 Engrossed- 54 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    Nothing in this subsection (k) is intended to affect, 2limit, or change the right of the electric utility to recover 3the costs associated with the procurement of renewable energy 4resources for periods commencing before, on, or after June 1, 52017, as otherwise provided in the Illinois Power Agency Act. 6    The funding available under this subsection (k), if any, 7for the programs described under subsection (b) of Section 81-56 of the Illinois Power Agency Act shall not reduce the 9amount of funding for the programs described in subparagraph 10(O) of paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of Section 1-75 of the 11Illinois Power Agency Act. If funding is available under this 12subsection (k) for programs described under subsection (b) of 13Section 1-56 of the Illinois Power Agency Act, then the 14long-term renewable resources plan shall provide for the 15Agency to procure contracts in an amount that does not exceed 16the funding, and the contracts approved by the Commission 17shall be executed by the applicable utility or utilities. 18    (k-5) An electric utility shall be entitled to recover 19through tariffed charges all costs associated with the 20purchase of geothermal renewable energy credits pursuant to 21the Geothermal Homes and Businesses Act. Such costs shall 22include: (i) the cost of procuring geothermal renewable energy 23credits, (ii) reasonable costs that the utility incurs as part 24of the procurement process, and (iii) costs incurred to 25implement and comply with any plan or process that is approved 26by the Commission.   HB3399 Engrossed- 55 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    (l) A utility that has terminated any contract executed 2under subsection (d-5) or (d-10) of Section 1-75 of the 3Illinois Power Agency Act shall be entitled to recover any 4remaining balance associated with the purchase of zero 5emission credits prior to such termination, and such utility 6shall also apply a credit to its retail customer bills in the 7event of any over-collection. 8    (m)(1) An electric utility that recovers its costs of 9procuring zero emission credits from zero emission facilities 10through a cents-per-kilowatthour charge under subsection (k) 11of this Section shall be subject to the requirements of this 12subsection (m). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, such 13electric utility shall, beginning on April 30, 2018, and each 14April 30 thereafter until April 30, 2026, calculate whether 15any reduction must be applied to such cents-per-kilowatthour 16charge that is paid by retail customers of the electric 17utility that have opted out of subsections (a) through (j) of 18Section 8-103B of this Act under subsection (l) of Section 198-103B. Such charge shall be reduced for such customers for 20the next delivery year commencing on June 1 based on the amount 21necessary, if any, to limit the annual estimated average net 22increase for the prior calendar year due to the future energy 23investment costs to no more than 1.3% of 5.98 cents per 24kilowatt-hour, which is the average amount paid per 25kilowatthour for electric service during the year ending 26December 31, 2015 by Illinois industrial retail customers, as   HB3399 Engrossed- 56 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1reported to the Edison Electric Institute. 2    The calculations required by this subsection (m) shall be 3made only once for each year, and no subsequent rate impact 4determinations shall be made. 5    (2) For purposes of this Section, "future energy 6investment costs" shall be calculated by subtracting the 7cents-per-kilowatthour charge identified in subparagraph (A) 8of this paragraph (2) from the sum of the 9cents-per-kilowatthour charges identified in subparagraph (B) 10of this paragraph (2): 11        (A) The cents-per-kilowatthour charge identified in 12    the electric utility's tariff placed into effect under 13    Section 8-103 of the Public Utilities Act that, on 14    December 1, 2016, was applicable to those retail customers 15    that have opted out of subsections (a) through (j) of 16    Section 8-103B of this Act under subsection (l) of Section 17    8-103B. 18        (B) The sum of the following cents-per-kilowatthour 19    charges applicable to those retail customers that have 20    opted out of subsections (a) through (j) of Section 8-103B 21    of this Act under subsection (l) of Section 8-103B, 22    provided that if one or more of the following charges has 23    been in effect and applied to such customers for more than 24    one calendar year, then each charge shall be equal to the 25    average of the charges applied over a period that 26    commences with the calendar year ending December 31, 2017   HB3399 Engrossed- 57 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    and ends with the most recently completed calendar year 2    prior to the calculation required by this subsection (m): 3            (i) the cents-per-kilowatthour charge to recover 4        the costs incurred by the utility under subsection 5        (d-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 6        Act, adjusted for any reductions required under this 7        subsection (m); and8            (ii) the cents-per-kilowatthour charge to recover 9        the costs incurred by the utility under Section 10        16-107.6 of the Public Utilities Act. 11        If no charge was applied for a given calendar year 12    under item (i) or (ii) of this subparagraph (B), then the 13    value of the charge for that year shall be zero. 14    (3) If a reduction is required by the calculation 15performed under this subsection (m), then the amount of the 16reduction shall be multiplied by the number of years reflected 17in the averages calculated under subparagraph (B) of paragraph 18(2) of this subsection (m). Such reduction shall be applied to 19the cents-per-kilowatthour charge that is applicable to those 20retail customers that have opted out of subsections (a) 21through (j) of Section 8-103B of this Act under subsection (l) 22of Section 8-103B beginning with the next delivery year 23commencing after the date of the calculation required by this 24subsection (m). 25    (4) The electric utility shall file a notice with the 26Commission on May 1 of 2018 and each May 1 thereafter until May   HB3399 Engrossed- 58 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b11, 2026 containing the reduction, if any, which must be 2applied for the delivery year which begins in the year of the 3filing. The notice shall contain the calculations made 4pursuant to this Section. By October 1 of each year beginning 5in 2018, each electric utility shall notify the Commission if 6it appears, based on an estimate of the calculation required 7in this subsection (m), that a reduction will be required in 8the next year. 9(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 10    (220 ILCS 5/16-111.5)11    Sec. 16-111.5. Provisions relating to procurement.12    (a) An electric utility that on December 31, 2005 served 13at least 100,000 customers in Illinois shall procure power and 14energy for its eligible retail customers in accordance with 15the applicable provisions set forth in Section 1-75 of the 16Illinois Power Agency Act and this Section. Beginning with the 17delivery year commencing on June 1, 2017, such electric 18utility shall also procure zero emission credits from zero 19emission facilities in accordance with the applicable 20provisions set forth in Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 21Agency Act, and, for years beginning on or after June 1, 2017, 22the utility shall procure renewable energy resources in 23accordance with the applicable provisions set forth in Section 241-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act and this Section. 25Beginning with the delivery year commencing on June 1, 2022,   HB3399 Engrossed- 59 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1an electric utility serving over 3,000,000 customers shall 2also procure carbon mitigation credits from carbon-free energy 3resources in accordance with the applicable provisions set 4forth in Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act and this 5Section. Beginning with the delivery year commencing on June 61, 2026, such electric utility shall also procure geothermal 7renewable energy credits in accordance with the applicable 8provisions set forth in the Geothermal Homes and Businesses 9Act. A small multi-jurisdictional electric utility that on 10December 31, 2005 served less than 100,000 customers in 11Illinois may elect to procure power and energy for all or a 12portion of its eligible Illinois retail customers in 13accordance with the applicable provisions set forth in this 14Section and Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act. 15This Section shall not apply to a small multi-jurisdictional 16utility until such time as a small multi-jurisdictional 17utility requests the Illinois Power Agency to prepare a 18procurement plan for its eligible retail customers. "Eligible 19retail customers" for the purposes of this Section means those 20retail customers that purchase power and energy from the 21electric utility under fixed-price bundled service tariffs, 22other than those retail customers whose service is declared or 23deemed competitive under Section 16-113 and those other 24customer groups specified in this Section, including 25self-generating customers, customers electing hourly pricing, 26or those customers who are otherwise ineligible for   HB3399 Engrossed- 60 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1fixed-price bundled tariff service. For those customers that 2are excluded from the procurement plan's electric supply 3service requirements, and the utility shall procure any supply 4requirements, including capacity, ancillary services, and 5hourly priced energy, in the applicable markets as needed to 6serve those customers, provided that the utility may include 7in its procurement plan load requirements for the load that is 8associated with those retail customers whose service has been 9declared or deemed competitive pursuant to Section 16-113 of 10this Act to the extent that those customers are purchasing 11power and energy during one of the transition periods 12identified in subsection (b) of Section 16-113 of this Act. 13    (b) A procurement plan shall be prepared for each electric 14utility consistent with the applicable requirements of the 15Illinois Power Agency Act and this Section. For purposes of 16this Section, Illinois electric utilities that are affiliated 17by virtue of a common parent company are considered to be a 18single electric utility. Small multi-jurisdictional utilities 19may request a procurement plan for a portion of or all of its 20Illinois load. Each procurement plan shall analyze the 21projected balance of supply and demand for those retail 22customers to be included in the plan's electric supply service 23requirements over a 5-year period, with the first planning 24year beginning on June 1 of the year following the year in 25which the plan is filed. The plan shall specifically identify 26the wholesale products to be procured following plan approval,   HB3399 Engrossed- 61 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1and shall follow all the requirements set forth in the Public 2Utilities Act and all applicable State and federal laws, 3statutes, rules, or regulations, as well as Commission orders. 4Nothing in this Section precludes consideration of contracts 5longer than 5 years and related forecast data. Unless 6specified otherwise in this Section, in the procurement plan 7or in the implementing tariff, any procurement occurring in 8accordance with this plan shall be competitively bid through a 9request for proposals process. Approval and implementation of 10the procurement plan shall be subject to review and approval 11by the Commission according to the provisions set forth in 12this Section. A procurement plan shall include each of the 13following components:14        (1) Hourly load analysis. This analysis shall include:15            (i) multi-year historical analysis of hourly 16        loads;17            (ii) switching trends and competitive retail 18        market analysis;19            (iii) known or projected changes to future loads; 20        and21            (iv) growth forecasts by customer class.22        (2) Analysis of the impact of any demand side and 23    renewable energy initiatives. This analysis shall include:24            (i) the impact of demand response programs and 25        energy efficiency programs, both current and 26        projected; for small multi-jurisdictional utilities,   HB3399 Engrossed- 62 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1        the impact of demand response and energy efficiency 2        programs approved pursuant to Section 8-408 of this 3        Act, both current and projected; and4            (ii) supply side needs that are projected to be 5        offset by purchases of renewable energy resources, if 6        any.7        (3) A plan for meeting the expected load requirements 8    that will not be met through preexisting contracts. This 9    plan shall include:10            (i) definitions of the different Illinois retail 11        customer classes for which supply is being purchased;12            (ii) the proposed mix of demand-response products 13        for which contracts will be executed during the next 14        year. For small multi-jurisdictional electric 15        utilities that on December 31, 2005 served fewer than 16        100,000 customers in Illinois, these shall be defined 17        as demand-response products offered in an energy 18        efficiency plan approved pursuant to Section 8-408 of 19        this Act. The cost-effective demand-response measures 20        shall be procured whenever the cost is lower than 21        procuring comparable capacity products, provided that 22        such products shall: 23                (A) be procured by a demand-response provider 24            from those retail customers included in the plan's 25            electric supply service requirements;26                (B) at least satisfy the demand-response   HB3399 Engrossed- 63 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1            requirements of the regional transmission 2            organization market in which the utility's service 3            territory is located, including, but not limited 4            to, any applicable capacity or dispatch 5            requirements;6                (C) provide for customers' participation in 7            the stream of benefits produced by the 8            demand-response products;9                (D) provide for reimbursement by the 10            demand-response provider of the utility for any 11            costs incurred as a result of the failure of the 12            supplier of such products to perform its 13            obligations thereunder; and14                (E) meet the same credit requirements as apply 15            to suppliers of capacity, in the applicable 16            regional transmission organization market; 17            (iii) monthly forecasted system supply 18        requirements, including expected minimum, maximum, and 19        average values for the planning period;20            (iv) the proposed mix and selection of standard 21        wholesale products for which contracts will be 22        executed during the next year, separately or in 23        combination, to meet that portion of its load 24        requirements not met through pre-existing contracts, 25        including but not limited to monthly 5 x 16 peak period 26        block energy, monthly off-peak wrap energy, monthly 7   HB3399 Engrossed- 64 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1        x 24 energy, annual 5 x 16 energy, other standardized 2        energy or capacity products designed to provide 3        eligible retail customer benefits from commercially 4        deployed advanced technologies including but not 5        limited to high voltage direct current converter 6        stations, as such term is defined in Section 1-10 of 7        the Illinois Power Agency Act, whether or not such 8        product is currently available in wholesale markets, 9        annual off-peak wrap energy, annual 7 x 24 energy, 10        monthly capacity, annual capacity, peak load capacity 11        obligations, capacity purchase plan, and ancillary 12        services;13            (v) proposed term structures for each wholesale 14        product type included in the proposed procurement plan 15        portfolio of products; and16            (vi) an assessment of the price risk, load 17        uncertainty, and other factors that are associated 18        with the proposed procurement plan; this assessment, 19        to the extent possible, shall include an analysis of 20        the following factors: contract terms, time frames for 21        securing products or services, fuel costs, weather 22        patterns, transmission costs, market conditions, and 23        the governmental regulatory environment; the proposed 24        procurement plan shall also identify alternatives for 25        those portfolio measures that are identified as having 26        significant price risk and mitigation in the form of   HB3399 Engrossed- 65 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1        additional retail customer and ratepayer price, 2        reliability, and environmental benefits from 3        standardized energy products delivered from 4        commercially deployed advanced technologies, 5        including, but not limited to, high voltage direct 6        current converter stations, as such term is defined in 7        Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act, whether 8        or not such product is currently available in 9        wholesale markets.10        (4) Proposed procedures for balancing loads. The 11    procurement plan shall include, for load requirements 12    included in the procurement plan, the process for (i) 13    hourly balancing of supply and demand and (ii) the 14    criteria for portfolio re-balancing in the event of 15    significant shifts in load.16        (5) Long-Term Renewable Resources Procurement Plan. 17    The Agency shall prepare a long-term renewable resources 18    procurement plan for the procurement of renewable energy 19    credits under Sections 1-56 and 1-75 of the Illinois Power 20    Agency Act for delivery beginning in the 2017 delivery 21    year.22            (i) The initial long-term renewable resources 23        procurement plan and all subsequent revisions shall be 24        subject to review and approval by the Commission. For 25        the purposes of this Section, "delivery year" has the 26        same meaning as in Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power   HB3399 Engrossed- 66 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1        Agency Act. For purposes of this Section, "Agency" 2        shall mean the Illinois Power Agency.3            (ii) The long-term renewable resources planning 4        process shall be conducted as follows:5                (A) Electric utilities shall provide a range 6            of load forecasts to the Illinois Power Agency 7            within 45 days of the Agency's request for 8            forecasts, which request shall specify the length 9            and conditions for the forecasts including, but 10            not limited to, the quantity of distributed 11            generation expected to be interconnected for each 12            year.13                (B) The Agency shall publish for comment the 14            initial long-term renewable resources procurement 15            plan no later than 120 days after the effective 16            date of this amendatory Act of the 99th General 17            Assembly and shall review, and may revise, the 18            plan at least every 2 years thereafter. To the 19            extent practicable, the Agency shall review and 20            propose any revisions to the long-term renewable 21            energy resources procurement plan in conjunction 22            with the Agency's other planning and approval 23            processes conducted under this Section. The 24            initial long-term renewable resources procurement 25            plan shall:26                    (aa) Identify the procurement programs and   HB3399 Engrossed- 67 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1                competitive procurement events consistent with 2                the applicable requirements of the Illinois 3                Power Agency Act and shall be designed to 4                achieve the goals set forth in subsection (c) 5                of Section 1-75 of that Act.6                    (bb) Include a schedule for procurements 7                for renewable energy credits from 8                utility-scale wind projects, utility-scale 9                solar projects, and brownfield site 10                photovoltaic projects consistent with 11                subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1) of 12                subsection (c) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois 13                Power Agency Act.14                    (cc) Identify the process whereby the 15                Agency will submit to the Commission for 16                review and approval the proposed contracts to 17                implement the programs required by such plan.18                Copies of the initial long-term renewable 19            resources procurement plan and all subsequent 20            revisions shall be posted and made publicly 21            available on the Agency's and Commission's 22            websites, and copies shall also be provided to 23            each affected electric utility. An affected 24            utility and other interested parties shall have 45 25            days following the date of posting to provide 26            comment to the Agency on the initial long-term   HB3399 Engrossed- 68 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1            renewable resources procurement plan and all 2            subsequent revisions. All comments submitted to 3            the Agency shall be specific, supported by data or 4            other detailed analyses, and, if objecting to all 5            or a portion of the procurement plan, accompanied 6            by specific alternative wording or proposals. All 7            comments shall be posted on the Agency's and 8            Commission's websites. During this 45-day comment 9            period, the Agency shall hold at least one public 10            hearing within each utility's service area that is 11            subject to the requirements of this paragraph (5) 12            for the purpose of receiving public comment. 13            Within 21 days following the end of the 45-day 14            review period, the Agency may revise the long-term 15            renewable resources procurement plan based on the 16            comments received and shall file the plan with the 17            Commission for review and approval.18                (C) Within 14 days after the filing of the 19            initial long-term renewable resources procurement 20            plan or any subsequent revisions, any person 21            objecting to the plan may file an objection with 22            the Commission. Within 21 days after the filing of 23            the plan, the Commission shall determine whether a 24            hearing is necessary. The Commission shall enter 25            its order confirming or modifying the initial 26            long-term renewable resources procurement plan or   HB3399 Engrossed- 69 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1            any subsequent revisions within 120 days after the 2            filing of the plan by the Illinois Power Agency.3                (D) The Commission shall approve the initial 4            long-term renewable resources procurement plan and 5            any subsequent revisions, including expressly the 6            forecast used in the plan and taking into account 7            that funding will be limited to the amount of 8            revenues actually collected by the utilities, if 9            the Commission determines that the plan will 10            reasonably and prudently accomplish the 11            requirements of Section 1-56 and subsection (c) of 12            Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act. The 13            Commission shall also approve the process for the 14            submission, review, and approval of the proposed 15            contracts to procure renewable energy credits or 16            implement the programs authorized by the 17            Commission pursuant to a long-term renewable 18            resources procurement plan approved under this 19            Section.20                In approving any long-term renewable resources 21            procurement plan after the effective date of this 22            amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, the 23            Commission shall approve or modify the Agency's 24            proposal for minimum equity standards pursuant to 25            subsection (c-10) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois 26            Power Agency Act. The Commission shall consider   HB3399 Engrossed- 70 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1            any analysis performed by the Agency in developing 2            its proposal, including past performance, 3            availability of equity eligible contractors, and 4            availability of equity eligible persons at the 5            time the long-term renewable resources procurement 6            plan is approved. 7            (iii) The Agency or third parties contracted by 8        the Agency shall implement all programs authorized by 9        the Commission in an approved long-term renewable 10        resources procurement plan without further review and 11        approval by the Commission. Third parties shall not 12        begin implementing any programs or receive any payment 13        under this Section until the Commission has approved 14        the contract or contracts under the process authorized 15        by the Commission in item (D) of subparagraph (ii) of 16        paragraph (5) of this subsection (b) and the third 17        party and the Agency or utility, as applicable, have 18        executed the contract. For those renewable energy 19        credits subject to procurement through a competitive 20        bid process under the plan or under the initial 21        forward procurements for wind and solar resources 22        described in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1) of 23        subsection (c) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 24        Agency Act, the Agency shall follow the procurement 25        process specified in the provisions relating to 26        electricity procurement in subsections (e) through (i)   HB3399 Engrossed- 71 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1        of this Section.2            (iv) An electric utility shall recover its costs 3        associated with the procurement of renewable energy 4        credits under this Section and pursuant to subsection 5        (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act 6        through an automatic adjustment clause tariff under 7        subsection (k) or a tariff pursuant to subsection 8        (i-5), as applicable, of Section 16-108 of this Act. A 9        utility shall not be required to advance any payment 10        or pay any amounts under this Section that exceed the 11        actual amount of revenues collected by the utility 12        under paragraph (6) of subsection (c) of Section 1-75 13        of the Illinois Power Agency Act, subsection (c-5) of 14        Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act, and 15        subsection (k) or subsection (i-5), as applicable, of 16        Section 16-108 of this Act, and contracts executed 17        under this Section shall expressly incorporate this 18        limitation.19            (v) For the public interest, safety, and welfare, 20        the Agency and the Commission may adopt rules to carry 21        out the provisions of this Section on an emergency 22        basis immediately following the effective date of this 23        amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly.24            (vi) On or before July 1 of each year, the 25        Commission shall hold an informal hearing for the 26        purpose of receiving comments on the prior year's   HB3399 Engrossed- 72 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1        procurement process and any recommendations for 2        change. 3    (b-5) An electric utility that as of January 1, 2019 4served more than 300,000 retail customers in this State shall 5purchase renewable energy credits from new renewable energy 6facilities constructed at or adjacent to the sites of 7coal-fueled electric generating facilities in this State in 8accordance with subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the 9Illinois Power Agency Act. Except as expressly provided in 10this Section, the plans and procedures for such procurements 11shall not be included in the procurement plans provided for in 12this Section, but rather shall be conducted and implemented 13solely in accordance with subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of 14the Illinois Power Agency Act. 15    (c) The provisions of this subsection (c) shall not apply 16to procurements conducted pursuant to subsection (c-5) of 17Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act. However, the 18Agency may retain a procurement administrator to assist the 19Agency in planning and carrying out the procurement events and 20implementing the other requirements specified in such 21subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 22Act, with the costs incurred by the Agency for the procurement 23administrator to be recovered through fees charged to 24applicants for selection to sell and deliver renewable energy 25credits to electric utilities pursuant to subsection (c-5) of 26Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act. The procurement   HB3399 Engrossed- 73 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1process set forth in Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 2Act and subsection (e) of this Section shall be administered 3by a procurement administrator and monitored by a procurement 4monitor.5        (1) The procurement administrator shall:6            (i) design the final procurement process in 7        accordance with Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 8        Agency Act and subsection (e) of this Section 9        following Commission approval of the procurement plan;10            (ii) develop benchmarks in accordance with 11        subsection (e)(3) to be used to evaluate bids; these 12        benchmarks shall be submitted to the Commission for 13        review and approval on a confidential basis prior to 14        the procurement event;15            (iii) serve as the interface between the electric 16        utility and suppliers;17            (iv) manage the bidder pre-qualification and 18        registration process;19            (v) obtain the electric utilities' agreement to 20        the final form of all supply contracts and credit 21        collateral agreements;22            (vi) administer the request for proposals process;23            (vii) have the discretion to negotiate to 24        determine whether bidders are willing to lower the 25        price of bids that meet the benchmarks approved by the 26        Commission; any post-bid negotiations with bidders   HB3399 Engrossed- 74 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1        shall be limited to price only and shall be completed 2        within 24 hours after opening the sealed bids and 3        shall be conducted in a fair and unbiased manner; in 4        conducting the negotiations, there shall be no 5        disclosure of any information derived from proposals 6        submitted by competing bidders; if information is 7        disclosed to any bidder, it shall be provided to all 8        competing bidders;9            (viii) maintain confidentiality of supplier and 10        bidding information in a manner consistent with all 11        applicable laws, rules, regulations, and tariffs;12            (ix) submit a confidential report to the 13        Commission recommending acceptance or rejection of 14        bids;15            (x) notify the utility of contract counterparties 16        and contract specifics; and17            (xi) administer related contingency procurement 18        events.19        (2) The procurement monitor, who shall be retained by 20    the Commission, shall:21            (i) monitor interactions among the procurement 22        administrator, suppliers, and utility;23            (ii) monitor and report to the Commission on the 24        progress of the procurement process;25            (iii) provide an independent confidential report 26        to the Commission regarding the results of the   HB3399 Engrossed- 75 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1        procurement event;2            (iv) assess compliance with the procurement plans 3        approved by the Commission for each utility that on 4        December 31, 2005 provided electric service to at 5        least 100,000 customers in Illinois and for each small 6        multi-jurisdictional utility that on December 31, 2005 7        served less than 100,000 customers in Illinois;8            (v) preserve the confidentiality of supplier and 9        bidding information in a manner consistent with all 10        applicable laws, rules, regulations, and tariffs;11            (vi) provide expert advice to the Commission and 12        consult with the procurement administrator regarding 13        issues related to procurement process design, rules, 14        protocols, and policy-related matters; and15            (vii) consult with the procurement administrator 16        regarding the development and use of benchmark 17        criteria, standard form contracts, credit policies, 18        and bid documents.19    (d) Except as provided in subsection (j), the planning 20process shall be conducted as follows:21        (1) Beginning in 2008, each Illinois utility procuring 22    power pursuant to this Section shall annually provide a 23    range of load forecasts to the Illinois Power Agency by 24    July 15 of each year, or such other date as may be required 25    by the Commission or Agency. The load forecasts shall 26    cover the 5-year procurement planning period for the next   HB3399 Engrossed- 76 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    procurement plan and shall include hourly data 2    representing a high-load, low-load, and expected-load 3    scenario for the load of those retail customers included 4    in the plan's electric supply service requirements. The 5    utility shall provide supporting data and assumptions for 6    each of the scenarios. 7        (2) Beginning in 2008, the Illinois Power Agency shall 8    prepare a procurement plan by August 15th of each year, or 9    such other date as may be required by the Commission. The 10    procurement plan shall identify the portfolio of 11    demand-response and power and energy products to be 12    procured. Cost-effective demand-response measures shall be 13    procured as set forth in item (iii) of subsection (b) of 14    this Section. Copies of the procurement plan shall be 15    posted and made publicly available on the Agency's and 16    Commission's websites, and copies shall also be provided 17    to each affected electric utility. An affected utility 18    shall have 30 days following the date of posting to 19    provide comment to the Agency on the procurement plan. 20    Other interested entities also may comment on the 21    procurement plan. All comments submitted to the Agency 22    shall be specific, supported by data or other detailed 23    analyses, and, if objecting to all or a portion of the 24    procurement plan, accompanied by specific alternative 25    wording or proposals. All comments shall be posted on the 26    Agency's and Commission's websites. During this 30-day   HB3399 Engrossed- 77 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    comment period, the Agency shall hold at least one public 2    hearing within each utility's service area for the purpose 3    of receiving public comment on the procurement plan. 4    Within 14 days following the end of the 30-day review 5    period, the Agency shall revise the procurement plan as 6    necessary based on the comments received and file the 7    procurement plan with the Commission and post the 8    procurement plan on the websites.9        (3) Within 5 days after the filing of the procurement 10    plan, any person objecting to the procurement plan shall 11    file an objection with the Commission. Within 10 days 12    after the filing, the Commission shall determine whether a 13    hearing is necessary. The Commission shall enter its order 14    confirming or modifying the procurement plan within 90 15    days after the filing of the procurement plan by the 16    Illinois Power Agency.17        (4) The Commission shall approve the procurement plan, 18    including expressly the forecast used in the procurement 19    plan, if the Commission determines that it will ensure 20    adequate, reliable, affordable, efficient, and 21    environmentally sustainable electric service at the lowest 22    total cost over time, taking into account any benefits of 23    price stability.24        (4.5) The Commission shall review the Agency's 25    recommendations for the selection of applicants to enter 26    into long-term contracts for the sale and delivery of   HB3399 Engrossed- 78 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    renewable energy credits from new renewable energy 2    facilities to be constructed at or adjacent to the sites 3    of coal-fueled electric generating facilities in this 4    State in accordance with the provisions of subsection 5    (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act, 6    and shall approve the Agency's recommendations if the 7    Commission determines that the applicants recommended by 8    the Agency for selection, the proposed new renewable 9    energy facilities to be constructed, the amounts of 10    renewable energy credits to be delivered pursuant to the 11    contracts, and the other terms of the contracts, are 12    consistent with the requirements of subsection (c-5) of 13    Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act. 14    (e) The procurement process shall include each of the 15following components:16        (1) Solicitation, pre-qualification, and registration 17    of bidders. The procurement administrator shall 18    disseminate information to potential bidders to promote a 19    procurement event, notify potential bidders that the 20    procurement administrator may enter into a post-bid price 21    negotiation with bidders that meet the applicable 22    benchmarks, provide supply requirements, and otherwise 23    explain the competitive procurement process. In addition 24    to such other publication as the procurement administrator 25    determines is appropriate, this information shall be 26    posted on the Illinois Power Agency's and the Commission's   HB3399 Engrossed- 79 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    websites. The procurement administrator shall also 2    administer the prequalification process, including 3    evaluation of credit worthiness, compliance with 4    procurement rules, and agreement to the standard form 5    contract developed pursuant to paragraph (2) of this 6    subsection (e). The procurement administrator shall then 7    identify and register bidders to participate in the 8    procurement event.9        (2) Standard contract forms and credit terms and 10    instruments. The procurement administrator, in 11    consultation with the utilities, the Commission, and other 12    interested parties and subject to Commission oversight, 13    shall develop and provide standard contract forms for the 14    supplier contracts that meet generally accepted industry 15    practices. Standard credit terms and instruments that meet 16    generally accepted industry practices shall be similarly 17    developed. The procurement administrator shall make 18    available to the Commission all written comments it 19    receives on the contract forms, credit terms, or 20    instruments. If the procurement administrator cannot reach 21    agreement with the applicable electric utility as to the 22    contract terms and conditions, the procurement 23    administrator must notify the Commission of any disputed 24    terms and the Commission shall resolve the dispute. The 25    terms of the contracts shall not be subject to negotiation 26    by winning bidders, and the bidders must agree to the   HB3399 Engrossed- 80 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    terms of the contract in advance so that winning bids are 2    selected solely on the basis of price.3        (3) Establishment of a market-based price benchmark. 4    As part of the development of the procurement process, the 5    procurement administrator, in consultation with the 6    Commission staff, Agency staff, and the procurement 7    monitor, shall establish benchmarks for evaluating the 8    final prices in the contracts for each of the products 9    that will be procured through the procurement process. The 10    benchmarks shall be based on price data for similar 11    products for the same delivery period and same delivery 12    hub, or other delivery hubs after adjusting for that 13    difference. The price benchmarks may also be adjusted to 14    take into account differences between the information 15    reflected in the underlying data sources and the specific 16    products and procurement process being used to procure 17    power for the Illinois utilities. The benchmarks shall be 18    confidential but shall be provided to, and will be subject 19    to Commission review and approval, prior to a procurement 20    event.21        (4) Request for proposals competitive procurement 22    process. The procurement administrator shall design and 23    issue a request for proposals to supply electricity in 24    accordance with each utility's procurement plan, as 25    approved by the Commission. The request for proposals 26    shall set forth a procedure for sealed, binding commitment   HB3399 Engrossed- 81 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    bidding with pay-as-bid settlement, and provision for 2    selection of bids on the basis of price.3        (5) A plan for implementing contingencies in the event 4    of supplier default or failure of the procurement process 5    to fully meet the expected load requirement due to 6    insufficient supplier participation, Commission rejection 7    of results, or any other cause.8            (i) Event of supplier default: In the event of 9        supplier default, the utility shall review the 10        contract of the defaulting supplier to determine if 11        the amount of supply is 200 megawatts or greater, and 12        if there are more than 60 days remaining of the 13        contract term. If both of these conditions are met, 14        and the default results in termination of the 15        contract, the utility shall immediately notify the 16        Illinois Power Agency that a request for proposals 17        must be issued to procure replacement power, and the 18        procurement administrator shall run an additional 19        procurement event. If the contracted supply of the 20        defaulting supplier is less than 200 megawatts or 21        there are less than 60 days remaining of the contract 22        term, the utility shall procure power and energy from 23        the applicable regional transmission organization 24        market, including ancillary services, capacity, and 25        day-ahead or real time energy, or both, for the 26        duration of the contract term to replace the   HB3399 Engrossed- 82 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1        contracted supply; provided, however, that if a needed 2        product is not available through the regional 3        transmission organization market it shall be purchased 4        from the wholesale market.5            (ii) Failure of the procurement process to fully 6        meet the expected load requirement: If the procurement 7        process fails to fully meet the expected load 8        requirement due to insufficient supplier participation 9        or due to a Commission rejection of the procurement 10        results, the procurement administrator, the 11        procurement monitor, and the Commission staff shall 12        meet within 10 days to analyze potential causes of low 13        supplier interest or causes for the Commission 14        decision. If changes are identified that would likely 15        result in increased supplier participation, or that 16        would address concerns causing the Commission to 17        reject the results of the prior procurement event, the 18        procurement administrator may implement those changes 19        and rerun the request for proposals process according 20        to a schedule determined by those parties and 21        consistent with Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 22        Agency Act and this subsection. In any event, a new 23        request for proposals process shall be implemented by 24        the procurement administrator within 90 days after the 25        determination that the procurement process has failed 26        to fully meet the expected load requirement.  HB3399 Engrossed- 83 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1            (iii) In all cases where there is insufficient 2        supply provided under contracts awarded through the 3        procurement process to fully meet the electric 4        utility's load requirement, the utility shall meet the 5        load requirement by procuring power and energy from 6        the applicable regional transmission organization 7        market, including ancillary services, capacity, and 8        day-ahead or real time energy, or both; provided, 9        however, that if a needed product is not available 10        through the regional transmission organization market 11        it shall be purchased from the wholesale market.12        (6) The procurement processes described in this 13    subsection and in subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the 14    Illinois Power Agency Act are exempt from the requirements 15    of the Illinois Procurement Code, pursuant to Section 16    20-10 of that Code.17    (f) Within 2 business days after opening the sealed bids, 18the procurement administrator shall submit a confidential 19report to the Commission. The report shall contain the results 20of the bidding for each of the products along with the 21procurement administrator's recommendation for the acceptance 22and rejection of bids based on the price benchmark criteria 23and other factors observed in the process. The procurement 24monitor also shall submit a confidential report to the 25Commission within 2 business days after opening the sealed 26bids. The report shall contain the procurement monitor's   HB3399 Engrossed- 84 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1assessment of bidder behavior in the process as well as an 2assessment of the procurement administrator's compliance with 3the procurement process and rules. The Commission shall review 4the confidential reports submitted by the procurement 5administrator and procurement monitor, and shall accept or 6reject the recommendations of the procurement administrator 7within 2 business days after receipt of the reports.8    (g) Within 3 business days after the Commission decision 9approving the results of a procurement event, the utility 10shall enter into binding contractual arrangements with the 11winning suppliers using the standard form contracts; except 12that the utility shall not be required either directly or 13indirectly to execute the contracts if a tariff that is 14consistent with subsection (l) of this Section has not been 15approved and placed into effect for that utility.16    (h) For the procurement of standard wholesale products, 17the names of the successful bidders and the load weighted 18average of the winning bid prices for each contract type and 19for each contract term shall be made available to the public at 20the time of Commission approval of a procurement event. For 21procurements conducted to meet the requirements of subsection 22(b) of Section 1-56 or subsection (c) of Section 1-75 of the 23Illinois Power Agency Act governed by the provisions of this 24Section, the address and nameplate capacity of the new 25renewable energy generating facility proposed by a winning 26bidder shall also be made available to the public at the time   HB3399 Engrossed- 85 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1of Commission approval of a procurement event, along with the 2business address and contact information for any winning 3bidder. An estimate or approximation of the nameplate capacity 4of the new renewable energy generating facility may be 5disclosed if necessary to protect the confidentiality of 6individual bid prices.7    The Commission, the procurement monitor, the procurement 8administrator, the Illinois Power Agency, and all participants 9in the procurement process shall maintain the confidentiality 10of all other supplier and bidding information in a manner 11consistent with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, and 12tariffs. Confidential information, including the confidential 13reports submitted by the procurement administrator and 14procurement monitor pursuant to subsection (f) of this 15Section, shall not be made publicly available and shall not be 16discoverable by any party in any proceeding, absent a 17compelling demonstration of need, nor shall those reports be 18admissible in any proceeding other than one for law 19enforcement purposes.20    (i) Within 2 business days after a Commission decision 21approving the results of a procurement event or such other 22date as may be required by the Commission from time to time, 23the utility shall file for informational purposes with the 24Commission its actual or estimated retail supply charges, as 25applicable, by customer supply group reflecting the costs 26associated with the procurement and computed in accordance   HB3399 Engrossed- 86 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1with the tariffs filed pursuant to subsection (l) of this 2Section and approved by the Commission.3    (j) Within 60 days following August 28, 2007 (the 4effective date of Public Act 95-481), each electric utility 5that on December 31, 2005 provided electric service to at 6least 100,000 customers in Illinois shall prepare and file 7with the Commission an initial procurement plan, which shall 8conform in all material respects to the requirements of the 9procurement plan set forth in subsection (b); provided, 10however, that the Illinois Power Agency Act shall not apply to 11the initial procurement plan prepared pursuant to this 12subsection. The initial procurement plan shall identify the 13portfolio of power and energy products to be procured and 14delivered for the period June 2008 through May 2009, and shall 15identify the proposed procurement administrator, who shall 16have the same experience and expertise as is required of a 17procurement administrator hired pursuant to Section 1-75 of 18the Illinois Power Agency Act. Copies of the procurement plan 19shall be posted and made publicly available on the 20Commission's website. The initial procurement plan may include 21contracts for renewable resources that extend beyond May 2009.22        (i) Within 14 days following filing of the initial 23    procurement plan, any person may file a detailed objection 24    with the Commission contesting the procurement plan 25    submitted by the electric utility. All objections to the 26    electric utility's plan shall be specific, supported by   HB3399 Engrossed- 87 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1    data or other detailed analyses. The electric utility may 2    file a response to any objections to its procurement plan 3    within 7 days after the date objections are due to be 4    filed. Within 7 days after the date the utility's response 5    is due, the Commission shall determine whether a hearing 6    is necessary. If it determines that a hearing is 7    necessary, it shall require the hearing to be completed 8    and issue an order on the procurement plan within 60 days 9    after the filing of the procurement plan by the electric 10    utility.11        (ii) The order shall approve or modify the procurement 12    plan, approve an independent procurement administrator, 13    and approve or modify the electric utility's tariffs that 14    are proposed with the initial procurement plan. The 15    Commission shall approve the procurement plan if the 16    Commission determines that it will ensure adequate, 17    reliable, affordable, efficient, and environmentally 18    sustainable electric service at the lowest total cost over 19    time, taking into account any benefits of price stability.20    (k) (Blank).21    (k-5) (Blank).22    (l) An electric utility shall recover its costs incurred 23under this Section and subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the 24Illinois Power Agency Act, including, but not limited to, the 25costs of procuring power and energy demand-response resources 26under this Section and its costs for purchasing renewable   HB3399 Engrossed- 88 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1energy credits pursuant to subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of 2the Illinois Power Agency Act. The utility shall file with the 3initial procurement plan its proposed tariffs through which 4its costs of procuring power that are incurred pursuant to a 5Commission-approved procurement plan and those other costs 6identified in this subsection (l), will be recovered. The 7tariffs shall include a formula rate or charge designed to 8pass through both the costs incurred by the utility in 9procuring a supply of electric power and energy for the 10applicable customer classes with no mark-up or return on the 11price paid by the utility for that supply, plus any just and 12reasonable costs that the utility incurs in arranging and 13providing for the supply of electric power and energy. The 14formula rate or charge shall also contain provisions that 15ensure that its application does not result in over or under 16recovery due to changes in customer usage and demand patterns, 17and that provide for the correction, on at least an annual 18basis, of any accounting errors that may occur. A utility 19shall recover through the tariff all reasonable costs incurred 20to implement or comply with any procurement plan that is 21developed and put into effect pursuant to Section 1-75 of the 22Illinois Power Agency Act and this Section, and for the 23procurement of renewable energy credits pursuant to subsection 24(c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act, 25including any fees assessed by the Illinois Power Agency, 26costs associated with load balancing, and contingency plan   HB3399 Engrossed- 89 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1costs. The electric utility shall also recover its full costs 2of procuring electric supply for which it contracted before 3the effective date of this Section in conjunction with the 4provision of full requirements service under fixed-price 5bundled service tariffs subsequent to December 31, 2006. All 6such costs shall be deemed to have been prudently incurred. 7The pass-through tariffs that are filed and approved pursuant 8to this Section shall not be subject to review under, or in any 9way limited by, Section 16-111(i) of this Act. All of the costs 10incurred by the electric utility associated with the purchase 11of zero emission credits in accordance with subsection (d-5) 12of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act, all costs 13incurred by the electric utility associated with the purchase 14of carbon mitigation credits in accordance with subsection 15(d-10) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act, and, 16beginning June 1, 2017, all of the costs incurred by the 17electric utility associated with the purchase of renewable 18energy resources in accordance with Sections 1-56 and 1-75 of 19the Illinois Power Agency Act, and all of the costs incurred by 20the electric utility in purchasing renewable energy credits in 21accordance with subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the 22Illinois Power Agency Act, shall be recovered through the 23electric utility's tariffed charges applicable to all of its 24retail customers, as specified in subsection (k) or subsection 25(i-5), as applicable, of Section 16-108 of this Act, and shall 26not be recovered through the electric utility's tariffed   HB3399 Engrossed- 90 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1charges for electric power and energy supply to its eligible 2retail customers.3    (m) The Commission has the authority to adopt rules to 4carry out the provisions of this Section. For the public 5interest, safety, and welfare, the Commission also has 6authority to adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this 7Section on an emergency basis immediately following August 28, 82007 (the effective date of Public Act 95-481).9    (n) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, any 10affiliated electric utilities that submit a single procurement 11plan covering their combined needs may procure for those 12combined needs in conjunction with that plan, and may enter 13jointly into power supply contracts, purchases, and other 14procurement arrangements, and allocate capacity and energy and 15cost responsibility therefor among themselves in proportion to 16their requirements.17    (o) On or before June 1 of each year, the Commission shall 18hold an informal hearing for the purpose of receiving comments 19on the prior year's procurement process and any 20recommendations for change. 21    (p) An electric utility subject to this Section may 22propose to invest, lease, own, or operate an electric 23generation facility as part of its procurement plan, provided 24the utility demonstrates that such facility is the least-cost 25option to provide electric service to those retail customers 26included in the plan's electric supply service requirements.   HB3399 Engrossed- 91 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1If the facility is shown to be the least-cost option and is 2included in a procurement plan prepared in accordance with 3Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency Act and this 4Section, then the electric utility shall make a filing 5pursuant to Section 8-406 of this Act, and may request of the 6Commission any statutory relief required thereunder. If the 7Commission grants all of the necessary approvals for the 8proposed facility, such supply shall thereafter be considered 9as a pre-existing contract under subsection (b) of this 10Section. The Commission shall in any order approving a 11proposal under this subsection specify how the utility will 12recover the prudently incurred costs of investing in, leasing, 13owning, or operating such generation facility through just and 14reasonable rates charged to those retail customers included in 15the plan's electric supply service requirements. Cost recovery 16for facilities included in the utility's procurement plan 17pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to review 18under or in any way limited by the provisions of Section 1916-111(i) of this Act. Nothing in this Section is intended to 20prohibit a utility from filing for a fuel adjustment clause as 21is otherwise permitted under Section 9-220 of this Act. 22    (q) If the Illinois Power Agency filed with the 23Commission, under Section 16-111.5 of this Act, its proposed 24procurement plan for the period commencing June 1, 2017, and 25the Commission has not yet entered its final order approving 26the plan on or before the effective date of this amendatory Act   HB3399 Engrossed- 92 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1of the 99th General Assembly, then the Illinois Power Agency 2shall file a notice of withdrawal with the Commission, after 3the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 99th General 4Assembly, to withdraw the proposed procurement of renewable 5energy resources to be approved under the plan, other than the 6procurement of renewable energy credits from distributed 7renewable energy generation devices using funds previously 8collected from electric utilities' retail customers that take 9service pursuant to electric utilities' hourly pricing tariff 10or tariffs and, for an electric utility that serves less than 11100,000 retail customers in the State, other than the 12procurement of renewable energy credits from distributed 13renewable energy generation devices. Upon receipt of the 14notice, the Commission shall enter an order that approves the 15withdrawal of the proposed procurement of renewable energy 16resources from the plan. The initially proposed procurement of 17renewable energy resources shall not be approved or be the 18subject of any further hearing, investigation, proceeding, or 19order of any kind.20    This amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly preempts 21and supersedes any order entered by the Commission that 22approved the Illinois Power Agency's procurement plan for the 23period commencing June 1, 2017, to the extent it is 24inconsistent with the provisions of this amendatory Act of the 2599th General Assembly. To the extent any previously entered 26order approved the procurement of renewable energy resources,   HB3399 Engrossed- 93 -LRB104 10086 AAS 20158 b1the portion of that order approving the procurement shall be 2void, other than the procurement of renewable energy credits 3from distributed renewable energy generation devices using 4funds previously collected from electric utilities' retail 5customers that take service under electric utilities' hourly 6pricing tariff or tariffs and, for an electric utility that 7serves less than 100,000 retail customers in the State, other 8than the procurement of renewable energy credits for 9distributed renewable energy generation devices. 10(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 11    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.